Nevada, session 83, AB319.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 629.515 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.515 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
before a provider of health care who is located at a distant site may
use telehealth to direct or manage the care or render a diagnosis of a
patient who is located at an originating site in this State or write a
treatment order or prescription for such a patient, the provider must
hold a valid license or certificate to practice his or her profession in
this State, including, without limitation, a [special purpose]
telemedicine license issued pursuant to NRS 630.261. The
requirements of this subsection do not apply to a provider of health
care who is providing services within the scope of his or her
employment by or pursuant to a contract entered into with an urban
Indian organization, as defined in 25 U.S.C. § 1603.
2. The provisions of this section must not be interpreted or
construed to:
(a) Modify, expand or alter the scope of practice of a provider of
health care; or
(b) Authorize a provider of health care to provide services in a
setting that is not authorized by law or in a manner that violates the
standard of care required of the provider of health care.
3. A provider of health care who is located at a distant site and
uses telehealth to direct or manage the care or render a diagnosis of
a patient who is located at an originating site in this State or write a
treatment order or prescription for such a patient:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(a) Is subject to the laws and jurisdiction of the State of Nevada,
including, without limitation, any regulations adopted by an
occupational licensing board in this State, regardless of the location
from which the provider of health care provides services through
telehealth.
(b) Shall comply with all federal and state laws that would apply
if the provider were located at a distant site in this State.
4. A provider of health care may establish a relationship with a
patient using telehealth when it is clinically appropriate to establish
a relationship with a patient in that manner. The State Board of
Health may adopt regulations governing the process by which a
provider of health care may establish a relationship with a patient
using telehealth.
5. A provider of health care who is located at an originating
site and is conducting a forensic medical examination of an apparent
victim of sexual assault or strangulation may use telehealth to
connect to an appropriately trained physician, physician assistant or
registered nurse who is located at a distant site for the purpose of
obtaining instructions and guidance on conducting the examination.
The provisions of this subsection must not be construed to prohibit
the use of telehealth for communication between providers of health
care in other circumstances authorized by law.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Distant site” means the location of the site where a
telehealth provider of health care is providing telehealth services to
a patient located at an originating site.
(b) “Originating site” means the location of the site where a
patient is receiving telehealth services from a provider of health care
located at a distant site.
(c) “Sexual assault” means a violation of NRS 200.366 or
200.368.
(d) “Strangulation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.481.
(e) “Telehealth” means the delivery of services from a provider
of health care to a patient at a different location through the use of
information and audio-visual communication technology, not
including facsimile or electronic mail. The term includes, without
limitation, communication between a provider of health care who is
providing in-person services to a patient and a provider of health
care at a different location and the delivery of services from a
provider of health care to a patient at a different location through the
use of:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(1) Synchronous interaction or an asynchronous system of
storing and forwarding information; and
(2) Audio-only interaction, whether synchronous or
asynchronous.
Sec. 2. Chapter 630 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 to 7, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 3. “Charging document” means a charging document
filed with the Board in accordance with NRS 622A.300.
Sec. 4. “Equivalent foreign country” means:
1. Canada, the United Kingdom, Australia and New Zealand;
and
2. Any other country designated by regulation of the Board
based upon a determination that the standards for medical
education and licensing in that country are substantially similar to
the standards for medical education and licensing in the United
States.
Sec. 5. “Foreign medical school” means a medical school
that is not located in the United States or an equivalent foreign
country.
Sec. 6. 1. For the purposes of this chapter:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a program of
postgraduate education or training is progressive if each year of
the program progresses in a continuous manner and the person
who completes the program does so in sequence without any
breaks of 12 weeks or longer.
(b) The Board shall deem a program of postgraduate
education or training approved by the Accreditation Council for
Graduate Medical Education, including, without limitation, such a
program that includes 1 year or more of scientific or clinical
research, to be progressive if the person who completes the
program does so in the format that was approved by the
Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, the
Executive Director of the Board or a designee thereof may, in his
or her discretion upon review of the program, determine that a
person has completed a progressive program of postgraduate
education or training if the person:
(a) Completed 1 or more years in a program that meets the
requirements of subsection 1; and
(b) Enrolled in a program that is closely related to the program
described in paragraph (a) and completed that program without
any breaks of 12 weeks or longer.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 7. Each time a physician or physician assistant performs
a routine physical examination of a person who is at least 12 years
of age but not more than 18 years of age, the physician or
physician assistant shall ask the person the questions prescribed in
the Medical History Form and the Physical Examination Form of
the Preparticipation Physical Evaluation Form developed jointly
by the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American
Academy of Pediatrics, the American College of Sports Medicine,
the American Medical Society for Sports Medicine, the American
Orthopaedic Society for Sports Medicine and the American
Osteopathic Academy of Sports Medicine, or any successor form.
Sec. 8. NRS 630.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.005 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 630.007 to 630.026,
inclusive, and sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 9. NRS 630.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.021 “Practice of respiratory care” includes:
1. Therapeutic and diagnostic use of medical gases, humidity
and aerosols and the maintenance of associated apparatus;
2. The administration of drugs and medications to the
cardiopulmonary system;
3. The provision of ventilatory assistance and control;
4. Postural drainage and percussion, breathing exercises and
other respiratory rehabilitation procedures;
5. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation and maintenance of natural
airways and the insertion and maintenance of artificial airways;
6. Carrying out the written orders of a physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, certified registered nurse
anesthetist or an advanced practice registered nurse relating to
respiratory care;
7. Techniques for testing to assist in diagnosis, monitoring,
treatment and research related to respiratory care, including the
measurement of ventilatory volumes, pressures and flows, collection
of blood and other specimens, testing of pulmonary functions ,
performance of laboratory testing authorized by NRS 652.210 and
hemodynamic and other related physiological monitoring of the
cardiopulmonary system; and
8. Training relating to the practice of respiratory care.
Sec. 10. NRS 630.047 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.047 1. This chapter does not apply to:
(a) A medical officer or perfusionist or practitioner of
respiratory care of the Armed Forces or a medical officer or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
perfusionist or practitioner of respiratory care of any division or
department of the United States in the discharge of his or her official
duties, including, without limitation, providing medical care in a
hospital in accordance with an agreement entered into pursuant to
NRS 449.2455;
(b) Physicians who are called into this State, other than on a
regular basis, for consultation with or assistance to a physician
licensed in this State, and who are legally qualified to practice in the
state where they reside;
(c) Physicians who are legally qualified to practice in the state
where they reside and come into this State on an irregular basis to:
(1) Obtain medical training approved by the Board from a
physician who is licensed in this State; or
(2) Provide medical instruction or training approved by the
Board to physicians licensed in this State;
(d) Physicians who are temporarily exempt from licensure
pursuant to NRS 630.2665 and are practicing medicine within the
scope of the exemption;
(e) Any person permitted to practice any other healing art under
this title who does so within the scope of that authority, or healing
by faith or Christian Science;
(f) The practice of respiratory care or perfusion by a student as
part of a program of study in respiratory care or perfusion, as
applicable, that is approved by the Board, or is recognized by a
national organization which is approved by the Board to review
such programs, if the student is enrolled in the program and
provides respiratory care or perfusion, as applicable, only under the
supervision of a practitioner of respiratory care [;] or a perfusionist,
as applicable;
(g) The practice of respiratory care by a student who:
(1) Is enrolled in a clinical program of study in respiratory
care which has been approved by the Board;
(2) Is employed by a medical facility, as defined in NRS
449.0151; and
(3) Provides respiratory care to patients who are not in a
critical medical condition or, in an emergency, to patients who are in
a critical medical condition and a practitioner of respiratory care is
not immediately available to provide that care and the student is
directed by a physician to provide respiratory care under the
supervision of the physician until a practitioner of respiratory care is
available;
(h) The practice of respiratory care by a person on himself or
herself or gratuitous respiratory care provided to a friend or a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
member of a person’s family if the provider of the care does not
represent himself or herself as a practitioner of respiratory care;
(i) A person who is employed by a physician and provides
respiratory care or services as a perfusionist under the supervision of
that physician;
(j) The maintenance of medical equipment for perfusion or
respiratory care that is not attached to a patient;
(k) A person who installs medical equipment for respiratory care
that is used in the home and gives instructions regarding the use of
that equipment if the person is trained to provide such services and
is supervised by a provider of health care who is acting within the
authorized scope of his or her practice;
(l) The performance of medical services by a student enrolled in
an educational program for a physician assistant which is accredited
by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the
Physician Assistant, Inc., or its successor organization, as part of
such a program; and
(m) A physician assistant of any division or department of the
United States in the discharge of his or her official duties unless
licensure by a state is required by the division or department of the
United States.
2. This chapter does not repeal or affect any statute of Nevada
regulating or affecting any other healing art.
3. This chapter does not prohibit:
(a) Gratuitous services outside of a medical school or medical
facility by a person who is not a physician, perfusionist, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care
in cases of emergency.
(b) The domestic administration of family remedies.
Sec. 11. NRS 630.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.130 1. In addition to the other powers and duties
provided in this chapter, the Board shall, in the interest of the public,
judiciously:
(a) Enforce the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Establish by regulation standards for licensure under this
chapter;
(c) [Conduct examinations for licensure and establish a system
of scoring for those examinations;
(d)] Investigate the character of each applicant for a license and
issue licenses to those applicants who meet the qualifications set by
this chapter and the Board; and
[(e)] (d) Institute a proceeding in any court to enforce its orders
or the provisions of this chapter.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
2. On or before February 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
Board shall submit to the Governor and to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the next regular
session of the Legislature a written report compiling:
(a) Disciplinary action taken by the Board during the previous
biennium against any licensee for malpractice or negligence;
(b) Information reported to the Board during the previous
biennium pursuant to NRS 630.3067, 630.3068, subsections 3 and 6
of NRS 630.307 and NRS 690B.250; and
(c) Information reported to the Board during the previous
biennium pursuant to NRS 630.30665, including, without limitation,
the number and types of surgeries performed by each holder of a
license to practice medicine and the occurrence of sentinel events
arising from such surgeries, if any.
 The report must include only aggregate information for statistical
purposes and exclude any identifying information related to a
particular person.
3. The Board may adopt such regulations as are necessary or
desirable to enable it to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
Such regulations may include, without limitation, regulations
requiring, as a condition for licensure, that an applicant pass one
or more examinations in addition to those required by this chapter
and regulations concerning the scoring of any such examination.
Sec. 12. NRS 630.131 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.131 1. On or before the last day of each quarter, the
Board shall provide the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine a list
of all anesthesiologist assistants licensed by the Board.
2. The Board and the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine
shall share information as necessary to enforce the provisions of
NRS 630.26835, 630.2684, 630.26845, 633.4256, 633.4258 and
633.426.
Sec. 13. NRS 630.132 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.132 1. On or before the last day of each quarter, the
Board shall provide to the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine a
list of all physician assistants licensed by the Board.
2. The Board and the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine
shall share information as necessary to enforce the provisions of
NRS 630.2677, 630.2735, 630.2755, 633.4332, 633.438 and
633.4718.
Sec. 14. NRS 630.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.160 1. Every person desiring to practice medicine must,
before beginning to practice, procure from the Board a license
authorizing the person to practice.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.1605 to 630.161,
inclusive, and 630.258 to 630.2665, inclusive, a license may be
issued to any person who:
(a) Has received the degree of doctor of medicine from a
medical school:
(1) Approved by the Liaison Committee on Medical
Education of the American Medical Association and Association of
American Medical Colleges; or
(2) Which provides a course of professional instruction
equivalent to that provided in medical schools in the United States
approved by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education;
(b) [Is currently certified by a specialty board of the American
Board of Medical Specialties and who agrees to maintain the
certification for the duration of the licensure, or has] Has passed:
(1) All parts of the examination given by the National Board
of Medical Examiners;
(2) All parts of the Federation Licensing Examination;
(3) All parts of the United States Medical Licensing
Examination;
(4) All parts of a licensing examination given by any state or
territory of the United States, if the applicant is certified by a
specialty board of the American Board of Medical Specialties;
(5) All parts of the most commonly administered
examination [to become a licentiate of the Medical Council of
Canada;] for medical licensure in an equivalent foreign country;
or
(6) Any combination of the examinations specified in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3) that the Board determines to be
sufficient; and
(c) Is currently certified by a specialty board of the American
Board of Medical Specialties in the specialty of emergency
medicine, preventive medicine or family medicine and who agrees
to maintain certification in at least one of these specialties for the
duration of the licensure, or:
(1) Has completed 36 months of progressive postgraduate:
(I) Education as a resident in the United States or
[Canada] an equivalent foreign country in a program approved by
the Board, a governmental entity that regulates medical education
in an equivalent foreign country, the Accreditation Council for
Graduate Medical Education, [the Royal College of Physicians and
Surgeons of Canada, the Collège des médecins du Québec or the
College of Family Physicians of Canada, or, as applicable, their] or
its successor [organizations;] organization, or an organization that
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
accredits graduate medical education in an equivalent foreign
country and is nationally recognized in that country; or
(II) Fellowship training in the United States or [Canada]
an equivalent foreign country approved by the Board or the
Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education;
(2) Has completed at least 36 months of postgraduate
education, not less than 24 months of which must have been
completed as a resident after receiving a medical degree from a
combined dental and medical degree program approved by the
Board; or
(3) Is a resident who is enrolled in a progressive postgraduate
training program in the United States or [Canada] an equivalent
foreign country approved by the Board, the Accreditation Council
for Graduate Medical Education, [the Royal College of Physicians
and Surgeons of Canada, the Collège des médecins du Québec or
the College of Family Physicians of Canada, or, as applicable, their]
its successor [organizations,] organization, or an organization that
accredits graduate medical education in an equivalent foreign
country and is nationally recognized in that country, has
[completed at least 24] less than 12 months [of] remaining before
he or she completes the program and has committed, in writing, to
the Board that he or she will complete the program . [; and
(d) Passes a written or oral examination, or both, as to his or her
qualifications to practice medicine and provides the Board with a
description of the clinical program completed demonstrating that the
applicant’s clinical training met the requirements of paragraph (a).]
3. The Board may issue a license to practice medicine after the
Board verifies, through any readily available source, that the
applicant has complied with the provisions of subsection 2. The
verification may include, but is not limited to, using the Federation
Credentials Verification Service. If any information is verified by a
source other than the primary source of the information, the Board
may require subsequent verification of the information by the
primary source of the information.
4. If the Board requires an applicant for a license to practice
medicine to pass an examination required pursuant to paragraph
(b) of subsection 2 within a prescribed number of attempts, the
Board may, by regulation, allow an applicant who is currently
certified by a specialty board of the American Board of Medical
Specialties more attempts to pass such an examination than the
Board allows to an applicant who does not hold such a
certification, if the applicant agrees to maintain his or her
certification for the duration of the licensure.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
5. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the
contrary, if, after issuing a license to practice medicine, the Board
obtains information from a primary or other source of information
and that information differs from the information provided by the
applicant or otherwise received by the Board, the Board may:
(a) Temporarily suspend the license;
(b) Promptly review the differing information with the Board as
a whole or in a committee appointed by the Board;
(c) Declare the license void if the Board or a committee
appointed by the Board determines that the information submitted
by the applicant was false, fraudulent or intended to deceive the
Board;
(d) Refer the applicant to the Attorney General for possible
criminal prosecution pursuant to NRS 630.400; or
(e) If the Board temporarily suspends the license, allow the
license to return to active status subject to any terms and conditions
specified by the Board, including:
(1) Placing the licensee on probation for a specified period
with specified conditions;
(2) Administering a public reprimand;
(3) Limiting the practice of the licensee;
(4) Suspending the license for a specified period or until
further order of the Board;
(5) Requiring the licensee to participate in a program to
correct an alcohol or other substance use disorder;
(6) Requiring supervision of the practice of the licensee;
(7) Imposing an administrative fine not to exceed [$5,000;]
$10,000;
(8) Requiring the licensee to perform community service
without compensation;
(9) Requiring the licensee to take a physical or mental
examination or an examination testing his or her competence to
practice medicine;
(10) Requiring the licensee to complete any training or
educational requirements specified by the Board; and
(11) Requiring the licensee to submit a corrected application,
including the payment of all appropriate fees and costs incident to
submitting an application.
[5.] 6. If the Board determines after reviewing the differing
information to allow the license to remain in active status, the action
of the Board is not a disciplinary action and must not be reported to
any national database. If the Board determines after reviewing the
differing information to declare the license void, its action shall be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
deemed a disciplinary action and shall be reportable to national
databases.
Sec. 15. NRS 630.1605 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.1605 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.161,
the Board may issue a license by endorsement to practice medicine
to an applicant who has been issued a license to practice medicine
by the District of Columbia or any state or territory of the United
States if:
(a) At the time the applicant files an application with the Board,
the license is active and in [effect;] good standing;
(b) The applicant:
(1) Submits to the Board proof of passage of an examination
listed in paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 630.160 or another
examination approved by regulation of the Board;
(2) Submits to the Board any documentation and other proof
of qualifications required by the Board;
(3) Meets all of the statutory requirements for licensure to
practice medicine in effect at the time of application except for
[the] :
(I) The requirements set forth in paragraph (c) of
subsection 2 of NRS 630.160; or
(II) Any other requirements specified by regulation of
the Board; and
(4) Completes any additional requirements relating to the
fitness of the applicant to practice required by the Board; and
(c) Any documentation and other proof of qualifications
required by the Board is authenticated in a manner approved by the
Board.
2. A license by endorsement to practice medicine may be
issued at a meeting of the Board or between its meetings by the
President and Executive Director of the Board. Such an action shall
be deemed to be an action of the Board.
Sec. 16. NRS 630.1607 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.1607 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.161,
the Board may issue a license by endorsement to practice medicine
to an applicant who is an active member of, or the spouse of an
active member of, the Armed Forces of the United States, a
veteran or the surviving spouse of a veteran and who meets the
requirements set forth in this section. An applicant may submit to
the Board an application for such a license if the applicant:
(a) Holds a corresponding valid and unrestricted license to
practice medicine in the District of Columbia or any state or
territory of the United States; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
(b) Is certified in a specialty recognized by the American Board
of Medical Specialties . [or the American Osteopathic Association.]
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement pursuant to this
section must submit to the Board with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
(1) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 1;
(2) Has not been disciplined and is not currently under
investigation by the corresponding regulatory authority of the
District of Columbia or any state or territory in which the applicant
holds a license to practice medicine; and
(3) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable for
malpractice in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States;
(b) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints in the manner
provided in NRS 630.167;
(c) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and correct; and
(d) Any other information required by the Board.
3. Not later than 15 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement to practice medicine pursuant to this
section, the Board shall provide written notice to the applicant of
any additional information required by the Board to consider the
application. Unless the Board denies the application for good cause,
including, without limitation, failure to comply with any
requirement imposed by the Board pursuant to NRS 630.257, the
Board shall approve the application and issue a license by
endorsement to practice medicine to the applicant not later than:
(a) Forty-five days after receiving all the additional information
required by the Board to complete the application; [or]
(b) Ten days after receiving a report on the applicant’s
background based on the submission of the applicant’s fingerprints
[,] ; or
(c) Ten days after receiving proof that the applicant has
complied with any requirement imposed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 630.257, if applicable,
 whichever occurs later.
4. A license by endorsement to practice medicine may be
issued at a meeting of the Board or between its meetings by the
President and Executive Director of the Board. Such an action shall
be deemed to be an action of the Board.
5. At any time before making a final decision on an application
for a license by endorsement pursuant to this section, the Board may
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
grant a provisional license authorizing an applicant to practice
medicine in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
6. As used in this section, “veteran” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 417.005.
Sec. 17. NRS 630.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.165 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an
applicant for a license to practice medicine must submit to the
Board, on a form provided by the Board, an application in writing,
accompanied by an affidavit stating that:
(a) The applicant is the person named in the proof of graduation
and that it was obtained without fraud or misrepresentation or any
mistake of which the applicant is aware; and
(b) The information contained in the application and any
accompanying material is complete and correct.
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement to practice
medicine pursuant to NRS 630.1605 [, 630.1606] or 630.1607 must
submit to the Board, on a form provided by the Board, an
application in writing, accompanied by an affidavit stating that:
(a) The applicant is the person named in the license to practice
medicine issued by the District of Columbia or any state or territory
of the United States and that the license was obtained without fraud
or misrepresentation or any mistake of which the applicant is aware;
and
(b) The information contained in the application and any
accompanying material is complete and correct.
3. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 must
include all information required to complete the application.
4. In addition to the other requirements for licensure, the Board
may require such further evidence of the mental, physical, medical
or other qualifications of the applicant as it considers necessary.
5. The applicant bears the burden of proving and documenting
his or her qualifications for licensure.
Sec. 18. NRS 630.167 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.167 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth in
this chapter, each applicant for a license to practice medicine,
including, without limitation, an expedited license pursuant to NRS
[630.1606 or] 630.1607 or chapter 629A of NRS, and each applicant
for a license to practice as a perfusionist, to practice as a physician
assistant, to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant or to practice
respiratory care shall submit to the Board a complete set of
fingerprints and written permission authorizing the Board to forward
the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
Investigation for its report. Any fees or costs charged by the Board
for this service pursuant to NRS 630.268 are not refundable.
2. Any communication between the Board and the Interstate
Medical Licensure Compact Commission created by NRS 629A.100
relating to verification of a physician’s eligibility for expedited
licensure pursuant to that section must not include any information
received in a report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
relating to a state and federal criminal records check performed for
the purposes of an application for an expedited license issued
pursuant to NRS 629A.100.
Sec. 19. NRS 630.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.170 In addition to the other requirements for licensure, an
applicant for a license to practice medicine who is a graduate of a
medical school located in the United States or [Canada] an
equivalent foreign country shall submit to the Board proof that the
applicant has received the degree of doctor of medicine from a
medical school which, at the time of graduation, was accredited by
the Liaison Committee on Medical Education or [the Committee for
the Accreditation of Canadian Medical Schools.] an organization
that accredits medical schools in an equivalent foreign country
and is nationally recognized in that country. The proof of the
degree of doctor of medicine must be submitted directly to the
Board by the medical school that granted the degree. If proof of
the degree is unavailable from the medical school, the Board may
accept proof from any other source specified by the Board.
Sec. 20. NRS 630.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.195 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS [630.1606
and] 630.1607, in addition to the other requirements for licensure,
an applicant for a license to practice medicine who is a graduate of a
foreign medical school shall submit to the Board proof that the
applicant has received:
(a) The degree of doctor of medicine or its equivalent, as
determined by the Board; and
(b) The standard certificate of the Educational Commission for
Foreign Medical Graduates or a written statement from that
Commission that the applicant passed the examination given by the
Commission.
2. The proof of the degree of doctor of medicine or its
equivalent must be submitted directly to the Board by the medical
school that granted the degree. If proof of the degree is unavailable
from the medical school that granted the degree, the Board may
accept proof from any other source specified by the Board.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
Sec. 21. NRS 630.254 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.254 1. Each licensee shall maintain a permanent mailing
address and electronic mail address with the Board to which all
communications from the Board to the licensee must be sent. A
licensee who changes his or her permanent mailing address or
electronic mail address shall notify the Board in writing of the new
permanent mailing address within 30 days after the change. If a
licensee fails to notify the Board in writing of a change in his or her
permanent mailing address within 30 days after the change, the
Board:
(a) May impose upon the licensee a fine not to exceed $250; and
(b) May initiate disciplinary action against the licensee as
provided pursuant to paragraph (j) of subsection 1 of NRS 630.306.
2. Any licensee who changes the location of his or her office in
this State shall notify the Board in writing of the change before
practicing at the new location.
3. Any licensee who closes his or her office in this State shall:
(a) Notify the Board in writing of this occurrence within 14 days
after the closure; and
(b) For a period of 5 years thereafter, unless a longer period of
retention is provided by federal law, keep the Board apprised in
writing of the location of the medical records of the licensee’s
patients.
[4. In addition to the requirements of subsection 1, any licensee
who performs any of the acts described in subsection 3 of NRS
630.020 from outside this State or the United States shall maintain
an electronic mail address with the Board to which all
communications from the Board to the licensee may be sent.]
Sec. 22. NRS 630.257 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.257 If [a] an inactive licensee does not engage in the
practice of medicine or practice as a physician assistant, as
applicable, for a period of more than 24 consecutive months, or if
an applicant for a license has not engaged in the practice of
medicine, perfusion or respiratory therapy, practiced as a
physician assistant or assisted in the practice of medicine, as
applicable, for more than 24 consecutive months before the date of
the application, the Board may require the licensee or applicant, as
applicable, to [take] :
1. Take the same examination to test [medical] competency as
that given to applicants for a license [.] , or a comparable
examination; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
2. Otherwise demonstrate his or her competency to practice
medicine, perfusion or respiratory therapy, practice as a physician
assistant or assist in the practice of medicine, as applicable.
Sec. 23. NRS 630.258 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.258 1. A physician who is retired from active practice
and who:
(a) Wishes to donate his or her expertise for the medical care
and treatment of persons in this State who are indigent, uninsured or
unable to afford health care; or
(b) Wishes to provide services for any disaster relief operations
conducted by a governmental entity or nonprofit organization,
 may obtain a special volunteer medical license by submitting an
application to the Board pursuant to this section.
2. An application for a special volunteer medical license must
be on a form provided by the Board and must include:
(a) Documentation of the history of medical practice of the
physician;
(b) Proof that the physician previously has been issued an
unrestricted license to practice medicine in any state of the United
States and that the physician has never been the subject of
disciplinary action by a medical board in any jurisdiction;
(c) Proof that the physician satisfies the requirements for
licensure set forth in NRS 630.160 or the requirements for licensure
by endorsement set forth in NRS 630.1605 [, 630.1606] or
630.1607;
(d) Acknowledgment that the practice of the physician under the
special volunteer medical license will be exclusively devoted to
providing medical care:
(1) To persons in this State who are indigent, uninsured or
unable to afford health care; or
(2) As part of any disaster relief operations conducted by a
governmental entity or nonprofit organization; and
(e) Acknowledgment that the physician will not receive any
payment or compensation, either direct or indirect, or have the
expectation of any payment or compensation, for providing medical
care under the special volunteer medical license, except for payment
by a medical facility at which the physician provides volunteer
medical services of the expenses of the physician for necessary
travel, continuing education, malpractice insurance or fees of the
State Board of Pharmacy.
3. If the Board finds that the application of a physician satisfies
the requirements of subsection 2 and that the retired physician is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
competent to practice medicine, the Board [must] may issue a
special volunteer medical license to the physician.
4. The initial special volunteer medical license issued pursuant
to this section expires 1 year after the date of issuance. The license
may be renewed pursuant to this section, and any license that is
renewed expires 2 years after the date of issuance of the renewed
license.
5. The Board shall not charge a fee for:
(a) The review of an application for a special volunteer medical
license; or
(b) The issuance or renewal of a special volunteer medical
license pursuant to this section.
6. A physician who is issued a special volunteer medical
license pursuant to this section and who accepts the privilege of
practicing medicine in this State pursuant to the provisions of the
special volunteer medical license is subject to all the provisions
governing disciplinary action set forth in this chapter.
7. A physician who is issued a special volunteer medical
license pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements
for continuing education adopted by the Board.
Sec. 24. NRS 630.259 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.259 1. A person may apply to the Board to be licensed as
an administrative physician if the person meets all of the statutory
requirements for licensure in effect at the time of application except
[the] for such requirements [of paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of
NRS 630.160.] as are specified by regulation of the Board.
2. A person who is licensed as an administrative physician
pursuant to this section:
(a) May not engage in the practice of clinical medicine;
(b) Shall comply with all of the statutory requirements for
continued licensure pursuant to this chapter; and
(c) Shall be deemed to hold a license to practice medicine in an
administrative capacity only.
Sec. 25. NRS 630.261 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.261 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.161,
the Board may issue:
(a) A locum tenens license, to be effective not more than 3
months after issuance, to any physician who is licensed and in good
standing in another state, who meets the requirements for licensure
in this State and who is of good moral character and reputation. The
purpose of this license is to enable an eligible physician to serve as a
substitute for another physician who is licensed to practice medicine
in this State and who is absent from his or her practice for reasons
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
deemed sufficient by the Board. A license issued pursuant to the
provisions of this paragraph is not renewable.
(b) [A special license to a licensed physician of another state to
come into this State to care for or assist in the treatment of his or her
own patient in association with a physician licensed in this State. A
special license issued pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph is
limited to the care of a specific patient. The physician licensed in
this State has the primary responsibility for the care of that patient.
(c) A restricted license for a specified period if the Board
determines the applicant needs supervision or restriction.
(d)] A temporary license for a specified period if the physician is
licensed and in good standing in another state and meets the
requirements for licensure in this State, and if the Board determines
that it is necessary in order to provide medical services for a
community without adequate medical care. A temporary license
issued pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph is not renewable.
[(e)] (c) A [special purpose] telemedicine license to a physician
who is licensed in another state to perform any of the acts described
in subsections 1 and 2 of NRS 630.020 by using equipment that
transfers information concerning the medical condition of a patient
in this State electronically, telephonically or by fiber optics,
including, without limitation, through telehealth, from within or
outside this State or the United States. A physician who holds a
[special purpose] telemedicine license issued pursuant to this
paragraph:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by specific statute or
regulation, shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and the
regulations of the Board; and
(2) To the extent not inconsistent with the Nevada
Constitution or the United States Constitution, is subject to the
jurisdiction of the courts of this State.
2. For the purpose of paragraph [(e)] (c) of subsection 1, the
physician must:
(a) Hold a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine in
another state;
(b) Not have had any disciplinary or other action taken against
him or her by any state or other jurisdiction; and
(c) Be certified by a specialty board of the American Board of
Medical Specialties or its successor.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Board may
renew or modify any license issued pursuant to subsection 1.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
Sec. 26. NRS 630.263 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.263 1. If the Governor determines that there are critically
unmet needs with regard to the number of physicians who are
practicing a medical specialty within this State, the Governor may
declare that a state of critical medical need exists for that medical
specialty. The Governor may, but is not required to, limit such a
declaration to one or more geographic areas within this State.
2. In determining whether there are critically unmet needs with
regard to the number of physicians who are practicing a medical
specialty, the Governor may consider, without limitation:
(a) Any statistical data analyzing the number of physicians who
are practicing the medical specialty in relation to the total
population of this State or any geographic area within this State;
(b) The demand within this State or any geographic area within
this State for the types of services provided by the medical specialty;
and
(c) Any other factors relating to the medical specialty that may
adversely affect the delivery of health care within this State or any
geographic area within this State.
3. If the Governor makes a declaration pursuant to this section,
the Board may waive the requirements of paragraph (c) of
subsection 2 of NRS 630.160 for an applicant if the applicant:
(a) Intends to practice medicine in one or more of the medical
specialties designated by the Governor in the declaration and, if the
Governor has limited the declaration to one or more geographic
areas within this State, in one or more of those geographic areas;
(b) Has completed at least 1 year of training as a resident in the
United States or [Canada] an equivalent foreign country in a
program approved by the Board, the Accreditation Council for
Graduate Medical Education, [the Royal College of Physicians and
Surgeons of Canada, the Collège des médecins du Québec or the
College of Family Physicians of Canada,] or [their] its successor
[organizations, respectively;] organization, or an organization that
accredits graduate medical education in an equivalent foreign
country and is nationally recognized in that country;
(c) Has a minimum of 5 years of practical medical experience as
a licensed allopathic physician or such other equivalent training as
the Board deems appropriate; and
(d) Meets all other conditions and requirements for a license to
practice medicine.
4. Any license issued pursuant to this section is a restricted
license, and the person who holds the restricted license may practice
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
medicine in this State only in the medical specialties and geographic
areas for which the restricted license is issued.
5. Any person who holds a restricted license issued pursuant to
this section and who completes 3 years of full-time practice under
the restricted license may apply to the Board for an unrestricted
license. In considering an application for an unrestricted license
pursuant to this subsection, the Board shall require the applicant to
meet all statutory requirements for licensure in effect at the time of
application except the requirements of paragraph (c) of subsection 2
of NRS 630.160.
Sec. 27. NRS 630.264 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.264 1. A board of county commissioners may petition
the Board of Medical Examiners to waive the requirements of
paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of NRS 630.160 for any applicant
intending to practice medicine in a medically underserved area of
that county as that term is defined by regulation by the Board of
Medical Examiners. The Board of Medical Examiners may waive
that requirement and issue a license if the applicant:
(a) Has completed at least 1 year of training as a resident in the
United States or Canada in a program approved by the Board, the
Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education, [the Royal
College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada, the Collège des
médecins du Québec or the College of Family Physicians of
Canada,] or [their] its successor [organizations, respectively;]
organization, or an organization that accredits graduate medical
education in an equivalent foreign country and is nationally
recognized in that country;
(b) Has a minimum of 5 years of practical medical experience as
a licensed allopathic physician or such other equivalent training as
the Board deems appropriate; and
(c) Meets all other conditions and requirements for a license to
practice medicine.
2. Any person licensed pursuant to subsection 1 must be issued
a license to practice medicine in this State restricted to practice in
the medically underserved area of the county which petitioned for
the waiver only. A person may apply to the Board of Medical
Examiners for renewal of that restricted license every 2 years after
being licensed.
3. Any person holding a restricted license pursuant to
subsection 1 who completes 3 years of full-time practice under the
restricted license may apply to the Board for an unrestricted license.
In considering an application for an unrestricted license pursuant to
this subsection, the Board shall require the applicant to meet all
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
statutory requirements for licensure in effect at the time of
application except the requirements of paragraph (c) of subsection 2
of NRS 630.160.
Sec. 28. NRS 630.265 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.265 1. Unless the Board denies such licensure pursuant
to NRS 630.161 for failure to comply with any requirement
imposed pursuant to NRS 630.257 or for other good cause, the
Board shall issue to a qualified applicant a limited license to practice
medicine as a resident physician in a graduate program approved by
the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education if the
applicant is:
(a) A graduate of an accredited medical school in the United
States or [Canada;] an equivalent foreign country; or
(b) A graduate of a foreign medical school and has received the
standard certificate of the Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates or a written statement from that Commission that
the applicant passed the examination given by it.
2. The medical school or other institution sponsoring the
program shall provide the Board with written confirmation that the
applicant has been appointed to a position in the program. A limited
license remains valid only while the licensee is actively practicing
medicine in the residency program . [and is legally entitled to work
and remain in the United States.]
3. The Board may issue a limited license for not more than 1
year but may renew the license if the applicant for the limited
license meets the requirements set forth by the Board by regulation.
4. The holder of a limited license may practice medicine only
in connection with his or her duties as a resident physician or under
such conditions as are approved by the director of the program.
5. The holder of a limited license granted pursuant to this
section may be disciplined by the Board at any time for any of the
grounds provided in NRS 630.161 or 630.301 to 630.3065,
inclusive.
Sec. 29. NRS 630.2677 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2677 1. A person applying to renew a license to practice
as a physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
who wishes to hold a simultaneous license to practice as a physician
assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 633 of NRS must:
[1.] (a) Indicate in the application that he or she wishes to hold
a simultaneous license to practice as a physician assistant pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 633 of NRS;
[2.] (b) Apply:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
[(a)] (1) To renew a license to practice as a physician assistant
to the Board pursuant to this chapter; and
[(b)] (2) For a license to practice as a physician assistant to the
State Board of Osteopathic Medicine pursuant to chapter 633 of
NRS; and
[3.] (c) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The fee for biennial simultaneous registration of a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
[(b)] (2) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
a physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501.
2. If an applicant to renew a license to practice as a physician
assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter indicates that
he or she wishes to hold a simultaneous license to practice as a
physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 633 of
NRS and pays the fee for biennial simultaneous registration of a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268 but does
not pay the application and initial simultaneous license fee for a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501 within 1
year after the renewal of his or her license pursuant to this
chapter:
(a) The Board of Medical Examiners shall notify the physician
assistant that he or she is required to pay to the Board the
difference between:
(1) The fee for biennial registration of a physician assistant
established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
(2) The fee for biennial simultaneous registration of a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
(b) The physician assistant shall pay to the Board of Medical
Examiners the amount required by paragraph (a) not later than
30 days after the date of the notice provided pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 30. NRS 630.268 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.268 1. The Board shall charge and collect not more than
the following fees:
For application for and issuance of a license to
practice as a physician, including a license
by endorsement ........................................................... $600
For application for and issuance of a
temporary, locum tenens, limited, restricted,
authorized facility, [special, special
purpose] telemedicine or special event
license ............................................................................ 400
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
For renewal of a limited, restricted [,] or
authorized facility [or special] license ......................... $400
For application for and issuance of a license as
a physician assistant, including a license by
endorsement .................................................................. 400
For application for and issuance of a
simultaneous license as a physician
assistant ......................................................................... 200
For biennial registration of a physician
assistant ......................................................................... 800
For biennial simultaneous registration of a
physician assistant ......................................................... 400
For biennial registration of a physician .............................. 800
For application for and issuance of a license as
a perfusionist or practitioner of respiratory
care ................................................................................ 400
For biennial renewal of a license as a
perfusionist .................................................................... 600
For application for and issuance of a license or
temporary license to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant ............................................... 400
For application for and initial issuance of a
simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist
assistant ......................................................................... 200
For biennial registration of an anesthesiologist
assistant ......................................................................... 800
For biennial simultaneous registration of an
anesthesiologist assistant ............................................... 400
For biennial registration of a practitioner of
respiratory care .............................................................. 600
For biennial registration for a physician who is
on inactive status ........................................................... 400
For written verification of licensure ..................................... 50
[For a duplicate identification card ...................................... 25]
For a duplicate license .......................................................... 50
[For computer printouts or labels ....................................... 500
For verification of a listing of physicians, per
hour ................................................................................ 20]
For furnishing a list of new physicians ............................... 100
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, in
addition to the fees [prescribed in] established pursuant to
subsection 1, the Board shall charge and collect necessary and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
reasonable fees for the expedited processing of a request or for any
other incidental service the Board provides.
3. The cost of any special meeting called at the request of a
licensee, an institution, an organization, a state agency or an
applicant for licensure must be paid for by the person or entity
requesting the special meeting. Such a special meeting must not be
called until the person or entity requesting it has paid a cash deposit
with the Board sufficient to defray all expenses of the meeting.
4. If an applicant submits an application for a license by
endorsement pursuant to [:
(a)] NRS 630.1607 [, and the applicant is an active member of,
or the spouse of an active member of, the Armed Forces of the
United States, a veteran or the surviving spouse of a veteran, the
Board shall collect not more than one-half of the fee set forth in
subsection 1 for the initial issuance of the license. As used in this
paragraph, “veteran” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 417.005.
(b) NRS] or 630.2752, the Board shall collect not more than
one-half of the fee set forth in subsection 1 for the initial issuance of
the license.
5. If an applicant submits an application for a license by
endorsement pursuant to NRS [630.1606 or] 630.2751, [as
applicable,] the Board shall charge and collect not more than the fee
specified in subsection 1 for the application for and initial issuance
of a license.
Sec. 31. NRS 630.26835 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
630.26835 1. A person applying for an anesthesiologist
assistant license pursuant to the provisions of this chapter who
wishes to hold a simultaneous license to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 633
of NRS must:
[1.] (a) Indicate in the application that he or she wishes to hold
a simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 633 of NRS;
[2.] (b) Apply for a license to practice as an anesthesiologist
assistant to:
[(a)] (1) The Board pursuant to this chapter; and
[(b)] (2) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine pursuant to
chapter 633 of NRS; and
[3.] (c) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The fee for application for and issuance of a
simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist assistant established
pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
[(b)] (2) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501.
2. If a person who applies for an anesthesiologist assistant
license pursuant to the provisions of this chapter indicates that he
or she wishes to hold a simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist
assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 633 of NRS and
pays the fee for application for and issuance of a simultaneous
license as an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to
NRS 630.268 and the person does not pay the application and
initial simultaneous license fee for an anesthesiologist assistant
established pursuant to NRS 633.501 within 1 year after the
issuance of his or her license pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The Board of Medical Examiners shall notify the person
that he or she is required to pay to the Board the difference
between:
(1) The fee for application for and issuance of a license to
practice as an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to
NRS 630.268; and
(2) The fee for application for and initial issuance of a
simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist assistant established
pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
(b) The person shall pay to the Board of Medical Examiners
the amount required by paragraph (a) not later than 30 days after
the date of the notice provided pursuant to paragraph (a).
Sec. 32. NRS 630.2684 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2684 1. A person applying to renew an anesthesiologist
assistant license pursuant to the provisions of this chapter who
wishes to hold a simultaneous anesthesiologist assistant license
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 633 of NRS must:
[1.] (a) Indicate in the application that he or she wishes to hold
a simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 633 of NRS;
[2.] (b) Apply:
[(a)] (1) To renew an anesthesiologist assistant license to the
Board pursuant to this chapter; and
[(b)] (2) For an anesthesiologist assistant license to the State
Board of Osteopathic Medicine pursuant to chapter 633 of NRS; and
[3.] (c) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The fee for biennial simultaneous registration of an
anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
[(b)] (2) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
2. If an applicant to renew an anesthesiologist assistant
license pursuant to the provisions of this chapter indicates that he
or she wishes to hold a simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist
assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 633 of NRS and
pays the fee for biennial simultaneous registration of an
anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268 but
does not pay the application and initial simultaneous license fee
for an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS
633.501 within 1 year after the renewal of his or her license
pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The Board of Medical Examiners shall notify the
anesthesiologist assistant that he or she is required to pay to the
Board the difference between:
(1) The fee for biennial registration of an anesthesiologist
assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
(2) The fee for biennial simultaneous registration of an
anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268;
and
(b) The anesthesiologist assistant shall pay to the Board of
Medical Examiners the amount required by paragraph (a) not
later than 30 days after the date of the notice provided pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 33. NRS 630.26845 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
630.26845 1. If a person licensed as an anesthesiologist
assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is not applying to
renew his or her license and wishes to hold a simultaneous license
as an anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter
633 of NRS, the person must:
[1.] (a) Apply for an anesthesiologist assistant license to the
State Board of Osteopathic Medicine pursuant to chapter 633 of
NRS; and
[2.] (b) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The fee for biennial simultaneous registration of an
anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
[(b)] (2) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501.
2. If a person licensed as an anesthesiologist assistant
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter pays the fee for biennial
simultaneous registration of an anesthesiologist assistant
established pursuant to NRS 630.268 in accordance with
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 but does not
pay the application and initial simultaneous license fee for an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501
within 1 year after the next time the person renews his or her
license pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The Board of Medical Examiners shall notify the
anesthesiologist assistant that he or she is required to pay to the
Board the difference between:
(1) The fee for biennial registration of an anesthesiologist
assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
(2) The fee for biennial simultaneous registration of an
anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268;
and
(b) The anesthesiologist assistant shall pay to the Board of
Medical Examiners the amount required by paragraph (a) not
later than 30 days after the date of the notice provided pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 34. NRS 630.269 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.269 The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
licensure of perfusionists, including, without limitation:
1. The criteria for licensure as a perfusionist and the standards
of professional conduct for holders of such a license;
2. The qualifications and fitness of applicants for licenses,
renewal of licenses and reciprocal licenses;
3. [The requirements for any practical, oral or written
examination for a license that the Board may require pursuant to
NRS 630.2692, including, without limitation, the passing grade for
such an examination;
4.] The [fees] fee for [examination and for] the reinstatement
of expired licenses;
[5.] 4. The requirements for continuing education for the
renewal of a license;
[6.] 5. A code of ethics for perfusionists; and
[7.] 6. The procedures for the revocation, suspension or denial
of a license for a violation of this chapter or the regulations of the
Board.
Sec. 35. NRS 630.2691 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2691 To be eligible for licensing by the Board as a
perfusionist, an applicant must:
1. Be a natural person of good moral character;
2. Submit a completed application as required by the Board ;
[by the date established by the Board;]
3. Submit any required fees ; [by the date established by the
Board;]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
4. Have successfully completed a perfusion education program
approved by the Board, which must:
(a) Have been approved by the Committee on Allied Health
Education and Accreditation of the American Medical Association
before June 1, 1994; or
(b) Be a program that has educational standards that are at least
as stringent as those established by the Accreditation Committee-
Perfusion Education and approved by the Commission on
Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs of the American
Medical Association, or its successor;
5. [Pass an examination required pursuant to NRS 630.2692;]
Hold a current, valid certification issued by the American Board
of Cardiovascular Perfusion, or its successor organization; and
6. Comply with any other requirements set by the Board.
Sec. 36. NRS 630.2695 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2695 1. Each license issued pursuant to NRS 630.2694
expires on June 30, or if June 30 is a Saturday, Sunday or legal
holiday, on the next business day after June 30, of every odd-
numbered year and may be renewed if, before the license expires,
the holder of the license submits to the Board:
(a) A completed application for renewal on a form prescribed by
the Board;
(b) Proof of completion of the requirements for continuing
education prescribed by regulations adopted by the Board pursuant
to NRS 630.269; and
(c) The applicable fee for renewal of the license prescribed by
the Board pursuant to NRS 630.2691.
2. A license that expires pursuant to this section not more than
2 years before an application for renewal is made may be reinstated
only if the applicant:
(a) Complies with the provisions of subsection 1; and
(b) Submits to the Board the fees:
(1) For the reinstatement of an expired license, prescribed by
regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 630.269; and
(2) For each biennium that the license was expired, for the
renewal of the license.
3. If a license has been expired for more than 2 years, a person
may not renew or reinstate the license but must apply for a new
license and [submit to the examination required] comply with any
requirement imposed by the Board pursuant to NRS [630.2692.]
630.257.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
4. The Board shall send a notice of renewal to each licensee not
later than 60 days before his or her license expires. The notice must
include the amount of the fee for renewal of the license.
Sec. 37. NRS 630.2696 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2696 1. The Board may issue a temporary license to
practice perfusion in this State to a person who has not yet
[completed the examination] obtained the certification required
pursuant to NRS [630.2692] 630.2691 but who:
(a) Has completed an approved perfusion education program;
(b) Files an application; and
(c) Pays the required fee.
2. A perfusionist shall supervise and direct a temporarily
licensed perfusionist at all times during which the temporarily
licensed perfusionist performs perfusion.
3. A temporary license is valid for 1 year after the date it is
issued and may be [extended subject to regulation by the Board.]
renewed once. The application for renewal must be signed by a
supervising licensed perfusionist.
[4. If a temporarily licensed perfusionist fails any portion of
the examination required pursuant to NRS 630.2692, he or she shall
immediately surrender the temporary license to the Board.]
Sec. 38. NRS 630.2735 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2735 1. A person applying for a license to practice as a
physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter who
wishes to hold a simultaneous license to practice as a physician
assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 633 of NRS must:
[1.] (a) Indicate in the application that he or she wishes to hold
a simultaneous license to practice as a physician assistant pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 633 of NRS;
[2.] (b) Apply for a license to practice as a physician assistant
to:
[(a)] (1) The Board pursuant to this chapter; and
[(b)] (2) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine pursuant to
chapter 633 of NRS; and
[3.] (c) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The fee for application for and issuance of a
simultaneous license as a physician assistant established pursuant to
NRS 630.268; and
[(b)] (2) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
a physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501.
2. If a person who applies for a license to practice as a
physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
indicates that he or she wishes to hold a simultaneous license to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
practice as a physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 633 of NRS and pays the fee for application for and
issuance of a simultaneous license as a physician assistant
established pursuant to NRS 630.268 but does not pay the
application and initial simultaneous license fee for a physician
assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501 within 1 year after
the issuance of his or her license pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The Board of Medical Examiners shall notify the person
that he or she is required to pay to the Board the difference
between:
(1) The fee for application for and issuance of a license as
a physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
(2) The fee for application for and initial issuance of a
simultaneous license as a physician assistant established pursuant
to NRS 630.268; and
(b) The person shall pay to the Board of Medical Examiners
the amount required by paragraph (a) not later than 30 days after
the date of the notice provided pursuant to paragraph (a).
Sec. 39. NRS 630.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.275 The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
licensure of a physician assistant, including, but not limited to:
1. The educational and other qualifications of applicants.
2. The required academic program for applicants.
3. The procedures for applications for and the issuance of
licenses.
4. The procedures deemed necessary by the Board for
applications for and the initial issuance of licenses by endorsement
pursuant to NRS 630.2751 or 630.2752.
5. The tests or examinations of applicants required by the
Board.
6. The medical services which a physician assistant may
perform, except that a physician assistant may not perform those
specific functions and duties delegated or restricted by law to
persons licensed as dentists, chiropractic physicians, naprapaths,
podiatric physicians and optometrists under chapters 631, 634,
634B, 635 and 636, respectively, of NRS, or as hearing aid
specialists.
7. The duration, renewal and termination of licenses, including
licenses by endorsement. [The Board shall not require a physician
assistant to receive or maintain certification by the National
Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants, or its
successor organization, or by any other nationally recognized
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
organization for the accreditation of physician assistants to satisfy
any continuing education requirements for the renewal of licenses.]
8. The grounds and procedures respecting disciplinary actions
against physician assistants.
9. The supervision of medical services of a physician assistant
by a supervising physician.
10. A physician assistant’s use of equipment that transfers
information concerning the medical condition of a patient in this
State electronically, telephonically or by fiber optics, including,
without limitation, through telehealth, from within or outside this
State or the United States.
Sec. 40. NRS 630.2751 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2751 1. The Board may issue a license by endorsement
to practice as a physician assistant to an applicant who meets the
requirements set forth in this section. An applicant may submit to
the Board an application for such a license if the applicant holds a
corresponding valid and unrestricted license to practice as a
physician assistant in the District of Columbia or any state or
territory of the United States.
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement pursuant to this
section must submit to the Board with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
(1) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 1; and
(2) Has not been disciplined [or] and is not currently being
investigated by the corresponding regulatory authority of the
District of Columbia or any state or territory in which the applicant
currently holds or has held a license to practice as a physician
assistant; [and
(3) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable for
malpractice in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States;]
(b) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints in the manner
provided in NRS 630.167;
(c) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and correct; and
(d) Any other information required by the Board.
3. Not later than 15 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement to practice as a physician assistant
pursuant to this section, the Board shall provide written notice to the
applicant of any additional information required by the Board to
consider the application. Unless the Board denies the application for
good cause, including, without limitation, failure to comply with
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
any requirement imposed by the Board pursuant to NRS 630.257,
the Board shall approve the application and issue a license by
endorsement to practice as a physician assistant to the applicant not
later than:
(a) Forty-five days after receiving the application; [or]
(b) Ten days after the Board receives a report on the applicant’s
background based on the submission of the applicant’s fingerprints
[,] ; or
(c) Ten days after the Board receives proof that the applicant
has complied with any requirement imposed by the Board
pursuant to NRS 630.257, if applicable,
 whichever occurs later.
4. A license by endorsement to practice as a physician assistant
may be issued at a meeting of the Board or between its meetings by
the President and Executive Director of the Board. Such an action
shall be deemed to be an action of the Board.
Sec. 41. NRS 630.2752 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2752 1. The Board may issue a license by endorsement
to practice as a physician assistant to an applicant who meets the
requirements set forth in this section. An applicant may submit to
the Board an application for such a license if the applicant:
(a) Holds a corresponding valid and unrestricted license to
practice as a physician assistant in the District of Columbia or any
state or territory of the United States; and
(b) Is an active member of, or the spouse of an active member
of, the Armed Forces of the United States, a veteran or the surviving
spouse of a veteran.
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement pursuant to this
section must submit to the Board with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
(1) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 1; and
(2) Has not been disciplined [or] and is not currently being
investigated by the corresponding regulatory authority of the
District of Columbia or the state or territory in which the applicant
holds a license to practice as a physician assistant; [and
(3) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable for
malpractice in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States;]
(b) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints in the manner
provided in NRS 630.167;
(c) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and correct; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
(d) Any other information required by the Board.
3. Not later than 15 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement to practice as a physician assistant
pursuant to this section, the Board shall provide written notice to the
applicant of any additional information required by the Board to
consider the application. Unless the Board denies the application for
good cause, including, without limitation, failure to comply with
any requirement imposed by the Board pursuant to NRS 630.257,
the Board shall approve the application and issue a license by
endorsement to practice as a physician assistant to the applicant not
later than:
(a) Forty-five days after receiving all the additional information
required by the Board to complete the application; [or]
(b) Ten days after the Board receives a report on the applicant’s
background based on the submission of the applicant’s fingerprints
[,] ; or
(c) Ten days after the Board receives proof that the applicant
has complied with any requirement imposed by the Board
pursuant to NRS 630.257, if applicable,
 whichever occurs later.
4. A license by endorsement to practice as a physician assistant
may be issued at a meeting of the Board or between its meetings by
the President and Executive Director of the Board. Such an action
shall be deemed to be an action of the Board.
5. At any time before making a final decision on an application
for a license by endorsement pursuant to this section, the Board may
grant a provisional license authorizing an applicant to practice as a
physician assistant in accordance with regulations adopted by the
Board.
6. As used in this section, “veteran” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 417.005.
Sec. 42. NRS 630.2755 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.2755 1. If a person licensed to practice as a physician
assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is not applying to
renew his or her license and wishes to hold a simultaneous license to
practice as a physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 633 of NRS, the person must:
[1.] (a) Apply for a license to practice as a physician assistant to
the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine pursuant to chapter 633 of
NRS; and
[2.] (b) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The fee for biennial simultaneous registration of a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
[(b)] (2) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
a physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501.
2. If a person licensed as a physician assistant pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter pays the fee for biennial
simultaneous registration of a physician assistant established
pursuant to NRS 630.268 in accordance with subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 but does not pay the application and
initial simultaneous license fee for a physician assistant
established pursuant to NRS 633.501 within 1 year after the next
time the person renews his or her license pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The Board of Medical Examiners shall notify the person
that he or she is required to pay to the Board the difference
between:
(1) The fee for biennial registration of a physician assistant
established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
(2) The fee for biennial simultaneous registration of a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268; and
(b) The person shall pay to the Board of Medical Examiners
the amount required by paragraph (a) not later than 30 days after
the date of the notice provided pursuant to paragraph (a).
Sec. 43. NRS 630.277 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.277 1. Every person who wishes to practice respiratory
care in this State must:
(a) [Have:
(1) A high school diploma; or
(2) A general equivalency diploma or an equivalent
document;
(b)] Complete an educational program for respiratory care which
has been approved by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied
Health Education Programs or its successor organization or the
Commission on Accreditation for Respiratory Care or its successor
organization;
[(c)] (b) Pass the examination as an entry-level or advanced
practitioner of respiratory care administered by the National Board
for Respiratory Care or its successor organization;
[(d)] (c) Be certified by the National Board for Respiratory Care
or its successor organization; and
[(e)] (d) Be licensed to practice respiratory care by the Board
and have paid the required fee for licensure.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a person shall
not:
(a) Practice respiratory care; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
(b) Hold himself or herself out as qualified to practice
respiratory care,
 in this State without complying with the provisions of
subsection 1.
3. Any person who has completed the educational requirements
set forth in [paragraphs] paragraph (a) [and (b)] of subsection 1
may practice respiratory care pursuant to a program of practical
training as an intern in respiratory care for not more than 12 months
after completing those educational requirements.
Sec. 44. NRS 630.301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.301 The following acts, among others, constitute grounds
for initiating disciplinary action or denying licensure:
1. Conviction of a felony relating to the practice of medicine or
the ability to practice medicine. A plea of nolo contendere is a
conviction for the purposes of this subsection.
2. Conviction of violating any of the provisions of NRS
616D.200, 616D.220, 616D.240, 616D.300, 616D.310, or 616D.350
to 616D.440, inclusive.
3. Any disciplinary action, including, without limitation, the
revocation, suspension, modification or limitation of a license to
practice any type of medicine, taken by another agency of this State
or another state, the Federal Government, a foreign country or any
other jurisdiction or the surrender of the license or discontinuing the
practice of medicine while under investigation by any licensing
authority, a medical facility, a branch of the Armed Services of the
United States, an insurance company, an agency of the Federal
Government or an employer.
4. Malpractice, which may be evidenced by claims settled
against a practitioner, but only if the malpractice is established by a
preponderance of the evidence.
5. The engaging by a practitioner in any sexual activity with a
patient who is currently being treated by the practitioner. For the
purposes of this subsection, a practitioner shall be deemed to be
currently treating a patient if the practitioner:
(a) Has treated the patient within the immediately preceding 3
years; and
(b) Has not discharged the patient in writing.
6. Disruptive behavior with physicians, hospital personnel,
patients, members of the families of patients or any other persons if
the behavior interferes with patient care or has an adverse impact on
the quality of care rendered to a patient.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
7. The engaging in conduct that violates the trust of a patient
and exploits the relationship between the physician and the patient
for financial or other personal gain.
8. The failure to offer appropriate procedures or studies, to
protest inappropriate denials by organizations for managed care, to
provide necessary services or to refer a patient to an appropriate
provider, when the failure occurs with the intent of positively
influencing the financial well-being of the practitioner or an insurer.
9. The engaging in conduct that brings the medical profession
into disrepute, including, without limitation, conduct that violates
any provision of a code of ethics adopted by the Board by regulation
based on a national code of ethics.
10. The engaging in sexual contact with the surrogate of a
patient or other key persons related to a patient, including, without
limitation, a spouse, parent or legal guardian, which exploits the
relationship between the physician and the patient in a sexual
manner.
11. Conviction of:
(a) Murder, voluntary manslaughter or mayhem;
(b) Any felony involving the use of a firearm or other deadly
weapon;
(c) Assault with intent to kill or to commit sexual assault or
mayhem;
(d) Sexual assault, statutory sexual seduction, incest, lewdness,
indecent exposure or any other sexually related crime;
(e) Abuse or neglect of a child or contributory delinquency;
(f) A violation of any federal or state law regulating the
possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance or any
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS; or
(g) Any offense involving moral turpitude.
Sec. 45. NRS 630.306 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.306 1. The following acts, among others, constitute
grounds for initiating disciplinary action or denying licensure:
(a) Inability to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety
because of illness, a mental or physical condition or the use of
alcohol, drugs, narcotics or any other substance.
(b) Engaging in any conduct:
(1) Which is intended to deceive;
(2) Which the Board has determined is a violation of the
standards of practice established by regulation of the Board; or
(3) Which is in violation of a provision of chapter 639 of
NRS, or a regulation adopted by the State Board of Pharmacy
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
pursuant thereto, that is applicable to a licensee who is a
practitioner, as defined in NRS 639.0125.
(c) Administering, dispensing or prescribing any controlled
substance, or any dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS,
to or for himself or herself or to others except as authorized by law.
(d) Performing, assisting or advising the injection of any
substance containing liquid silicone into the human body, except for
the use of silicone oil to repair a retinal detachment.
(e) Practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope permitted
by law or performing services which the licensee knows or has
reason to know that he or she is not competent to perform or which
are beyond the scope of his or her training.
(f) Performing, without first obtaining the informed consent of
the patient or the patient’s family, any procedure or prescribing any
therapy which by the current standards of the practice of medicine is
experimental.
(g) Continual failure to exercise the skill or diligence or use the
methods ordinarily exercised under the same circumstances by
physicians in good standing practicing in the same specialty or field.
(h) Having an alcohol or other substance use disorder.
(i) Making or filing a report which the licensee or applicant
knows to be false or failing to file a record or report as required by
law or regulation.
(j) Failing to comply with the requirements of NRS 630.254.
(k) Failure by a licensee or applicant to report in writing, within
30 days, any disciplinary action taken against the licensee or
applicant by another state, the Federal Government or a foreign
country, including, without limitation, the revocation, suspension or
surrender of a license to practice medicine in another jurisdiction.
The provisions of this paragraph do not apply to any disciplinary
action taken by the Board or taken because of any disciplinary
action taken by the Board.
(l) Failure by a licensee or applicant to report in writing, within
30 days, any arrest or criminal [action taken or] conviction
[obtained against] of the licensee or applicant, other than a minor
traffic violation, in this State or any other state or by the Federal
Government, a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or
any local or federal jurisdiction of a foreign country.
(m) Failure to be found competent to practice medicine as a
result of an examination to determine medical competency pursuant
to NRS 630.318.
(n) Operation of a medical facility at any time during which:
(1) The license of the facility is suspended or revoked; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
(2) An act or omission occurs which results in the suspension
or revocation of the license pursuant to NRS 449.160.
 This paragraph applies to an owner or other principal responsible
for the operation of the facility.
(o) Failure to comply with the requirements of NRS 630.373.
(p) Engaging in any act that is unsafe or unprofessional conduct
in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
(q) Knowingly or willfully procuring or administering a
controlled substance or a dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454
of NRS that is not approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, unless the unapproved controlled substance or
dangerous drug:
(1) Was procured through a retail pharmacy licensed
pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS;
(2) Was procured through a Canadian pharmacy which is
licensed pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS and which has been
recommended by the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 639.2328;
(3) Is cannabis being used for medical purposes in
accordance with chapter 678C of NRS; or
(4) Is an individualized investigational treatment or
investigational drug or biological product prescribed to a patient
pursuant to NRS 630.3735 or 633.6945.
(r) Failure to supervise adequately a medical assistant pursuant
to the regulations of the Board.
(s) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 630.3745.
(t) Failure to obtain any training required by the Board pursuant
to NRS 630.2535.
(u) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 454.217 or
629.086.
(v) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315 or
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
(w) Performing or supervising the performance of a pelvic
examination in violation of NRS 629.085.
(x) Failure to respond to the Board or an investigative
committee of the Board during an investigation or otherwise
cooperate with an investigation pursuant to this chapter.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Individualized investigational treatment” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 454.690.
(b) “Investigational drug or biological product” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 454.351.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
Sec. 46. NRS 630.3067 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.3067 1. The insurer of a physician, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist licensed under this chapter shall report to the Board:
(a) Any action for malpractice against the physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care
or perfusionist not later than 45 days after the physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care
or perfusionist receives service of a summons and complaint for the
action;
(b) Any claim for malpractice against the physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care
or perfusionist that is submitted to arbitration or mediation not later
than 45 days after the claim is submitted to arbitration or mediation;
and
(c) Any settlement, award, judgment or other disposition of any
action or claim described in paragraph (a) or (b) not later than 45
days after the settlement, award, judgment or other disposition.
2. The Board shall report any failure to comply with subsection
1 by an insurer licensed in this State to the Division of Insurance of
the Department of Business and Industry. If, after a hearing, the
Division of Insurance determines that any such insurer failed to
comply with the requirements of subsection 1, the Division may
impose an administrative fine of not more than $10,000 against the
insurer for each such failure to report. If the administrative fine is
not paid when due, the fine must be recovered in a civil action
brought by the Attorney General on behalf of the Division.
3. Except where otherwise required by law, a report made by
an insurer pursuant to this section is a public record.
Sec. 47. NRS 630.3068 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.3068 1. A physician, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist shall report to the Board:
(a) Any action for malpractice against the physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care
or perfusionist not later than 45 days after the physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care
or perfusionist receives service of a summons and complaint for the
action;
(b) Any claim for malpractice against the physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care
or perfusionist that is submitted to arbitration or mediation not later
than 45 days after the claim is submitted to arbitration or mediation;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
(c) Any settlement, award, judgment or other disposition of any
action or claim described in paragraph (a) or (b) not later than 45
days after the settlement, award, judgment or other disposition,
including, without limitation, any amount paid to resolve the claim;
and
(d) Any sanctions imposed against the physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care
or perfusionist that are reportable to the National Practitioner Data
Bank not later than 45 days after the sanctions are imposed.
2. If the Board finds that a physician, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist has violated any provision of this section, the Board
may impose a fine of not more than $5,000 against the physician,
physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of
respiratory care or perfusionist for each violation, in addition to any
other fines or penalties permitted by law.
3. All reports made by a physician, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist pursuant to this section are public records.
Sec. 48. NRS 630.3069 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.3069 If the Board receives a report pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 630.3067, 630.3068 or 690B.250 indicating that
a judgment has been rendered or an award has been made against a
physician, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant,
practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist regarding an action or
claim for malpractice or that such an action or claim against the
physician, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant,
practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist has been resolved by
settlement, the Board shall conduct an investigation to determine
whether to impose disciplinary action against the physician,
physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of
respiratory care or perfusionist regarding the action or claim, unless
the Board has already commenced or completed such an
investigation regarding the action or claim before it receives the
report.
Sec. 49. NRS 630.307 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.307 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, any
person may file with the Board a complaint against a physician,
perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or
practitioner of respiratory care on a form provided by the Board.
The form may be submitted in writing or electronically. If a
complaint is submitted anonymously, the Board may accept the
complaint but may refuse to consider the complaint if the lack of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
identity of the complainant makes processing the complaint
impossible or unfair to the person who is the subject of the
complaint.
2. Any licensee, medical school or medical facility that
becomes aware that a person practicing medicine, perfusion or
respiratory care or assisting in the practice of medicine in this State
has, is or is about to become engaged in conduct which constitutes
grounds for initiating disciplinary action shall file a written
complaint with the Board within 30 days after becoming aware of
the conduct.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, any hospital,
clinic or other medical facility licensed in this State, or medical
society, shall report to the Board any change in the privileges of a
physician, perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant or practitioner of respiratory care to practice while the
physician, perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant or practitioner of respiratory care is under investigation and
the outcome of any disciplinary action taken by that facility or
society against the physician, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care
concerning the care of a patient or the competency of the physician,
perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or
practitioner of respiratory care within 30 days after the change in
privileges is made or disciplinary action is taken.
4. A hospital, clinic or other medical facility licensed in this
State, or medical society, shall report to the Board within 5 days
after a change in the privileges of a physician, perfusionist,
physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of
respiratory care to practice that is based on:
(a) An investigation of the mental, medical or psychological
competency of the physician, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care; or
(b) Suspected or alleged substance abuse in any form by the
physician, perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant or practitioner of respiratory care.
5. The Board shall report any failure to comply with subsection
3 or 4 by a hospital, clinic or other medical facility licensed in this
State to the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services. If, after a hearing, the
Division of Public and Behavioral Health determines that any such
facility or society failed to comply with the requirements of
subsection 3 or 4, the Division may impose an administrative fine of
not more than $10,000 against the facility or society for each such
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
failure to report. If the administrative fine is not paid when due, the
fine must be recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney
General on behalf of the Division.
6. The clerk of every court shall report to the Board any
finding, judgment or other determination of the court that a
physician, perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant or practitioner of respiratory care:
(a) Is mentally ill;
(b) Is mentally incompetent;
(c) Has been convicted of a felony or any law governing
controlled substances or dangerous drugs;
(d) Is guilty of abuse or fraud under any state or federal program
providing medical assistance; or
(e) Is liable for damages for malpractice or negligence,
 within 45 days after such a finding, judgment or determination is
made.
7. If the Board receives a report pursuant to subsection 5 of
NRS 228.420, the Board must proceed as if a complaint had been
filed against the licensee who is the subject of the report.
8. The Board shall retain all complaints filed with the Board
pursuant to this section for at least 10 years, including, without
limitation, any complaints not acted upon.
Sec. 50. NRS 630.309 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.309 To institute a disciplinary action against a perfusionist,
physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of
respiratory care, a written [complaint,] charging document,
specifying the charges, must be filed with the Board by [:
1. The] the Board or a committee designated by the Board to
investigate a complaint . [;
2. Any member of the Board; or
3. Any other person who is aware of any act or circumstance
constituting a ground for disciplinary action set forth in the
regulations adopted by the Board.]
Sec. 51. NRS 630.311 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.311 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.323, a
committee designated by the Board and consisting of members of
the Board shall review each complaint received by the Board that is
within the jurisdiction of the Board and conduct an investigation to
determine if there is a reasonable basis for the complaint. The
committee must be composed of at least three members of the
Board, at least one of whom is not a physician. The committee may
issue orders to aid its investigation including, but not limited to,
compelling a physician to appear before the committee.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 47 –
2. If, after conducting an investigation, the committee
determines that there is a reasonable basis for the complaint and that
a violation of any provision of this chapter has occurred, the
committee may file a formal [complaint] charging document with
the Board.
3. The proceedings of the committee are confidential and are
not subject to the requirements of NRS 241.020. Within 20 days
after the conclusion of each meeting of the committee, the Board
shall publish a summary setting forth the proceedings and
determinations of the committee. The summary must not identify
any person involved in the complaint that is the subject of the
proceedings.
Sec. 52. NRS 630.318 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.318 1. If the Board or any investigative committee of the
Board has reason to believe that the conduct of any physician,
physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of
respiratory care or perfusionist has raised a reasonable question as to
his or her competence to practice medicine, respiratory care or
perfusion , [or] practice as a physician assistant [,] or assist in the
practice of medicine, as applicable, with reasonable skill and safety
to patients, or if the Board has received a report pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 630.3067, 630.3068 or 690B.250 indicating that
a judgment has been rendered or an award has been made against a
physician, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant,
practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist regarding an action or
claim for malpractice or that such an action or claim against the
physician, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant,
practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist has been resolved by
settlement, the Board or committee may order that the physician,
physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of
respiratory care or perfusionist undergo a mental or physical
examination, an examination testing his or her competence to
practice medicine, respiratory care or perfusion , [or] practice as a
physician assistant [,] or assist in the practice of medicine, as
applicable, or any other examination designated by the Board to
assist the Board or committee in determining the fitness of the
physician, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant,
practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist to practice medicine,
respiratory care or perfusion , [or] practice as a physician assistant
[,] or assist in the practice of medicine, as applicable.
2. For the purposes of this section:
(a) Every physician, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant, practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist who applies
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 48 –
for a license or who is licensed under this chapter shall be deemed to
have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination or
an examination testing his or her competence to practice medicine,
respiratory care or perfusion , [or] practice as a physician assistant
[,] or assist in the practice of medicine, as applicable, when ordered
to do so in writing by the Board or an investigative committee of the
Board.
(b) The testimony or reports of a person who conducts an
examination of a physician, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant, practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist on behalf of
the Board or an investigative committee of the Board pursuant to
this section are not privileged communications.
3. Except in extraordinary circumstances, as determined by the
Board, the failure of a physician, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care or
perfusionist licensed under this chapter to submit to an examination
when directed as provided in this section constitutes [an] :
(a) Grounds for the immediate suspension of the license of the
physician, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant,
practitioner of respiratory care or perfusionist pending further
disciplinary proceedings; and
(b) An admission of the charges against the physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, practitioner of respiratory care
or perfusionist.
Sec. 53. NRS 630.323 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.323 1. The Executive Director of the Board or his or her
designee shall review and evaluate any complaint or information
received from the Investigation Division of the Department of
Public Safety or the State Board of Pharmacy, including, without
limitation, information provided pursuant to NRS 453.164, or from
a law enforcement agency, professional licensing board or any other
source indicating that:
(a) A licensee has issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV;
(b) A pattern of prescriptions issued by a licensee indicates that
the licensee has issued prescriptions in the manner described in
paragraph (a); or
(c) A patient of a licensee has acquired, used or possessed a
controlled substance listed in schedule II, III or IV in a fraudulent,
illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate manner.
2. If the Executive Director of the Board or his or her designee
receives information described in subsection 1 concerning the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 49 –
licensee, the Executive Director or his or her designee must notify
the licensee as soon as practicable after receiving the information.
3. A review and evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection 1
must include, without limitation:
(a) A review of relevant information contained in the database
of the program established pursuant to NRS 453.162; and
(b) A request for additional relevant information from the
licensee who is the subject of the review and evaluation.
4. If, after a review and evaluation conducted pursuant to
subsection 1, the Executive Director or his or her designee
determines that a licensee may have issued a fraudulent, illegal,
unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate prescription for a controlled
substance listed in schedule II, III or IV, the Board must proceed as
if a written complaint had been filed against the licensee. If, after
conducting an investigation and a hearing in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, the Board determines that the licensee
issued a fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate
prescription, the Board must impose appropriate disciplinary action.
5. When deemed appropriate, the Executive Director of the
Board may:
(a) Refer information acquired during a review and evaluation
conducted pursuant to subsection 1 to another professional licensing
board, law enforcement agency or other appropriate governmental
entity for investigation and criminal or administrative proceedings.
(b) Postpone any notification, review or part of such a review
required by this section if he or she determines that it is necessary to
avoid interfering with any pending administrative or criminal
investigation into the suspected fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescribing, dispensing or use of a
controlled substance.
6. The Board shall:
(a) Adopt regulations providing for disciplinary action against a
licensee for inappropriately prescribing a controlled substance listed
in schedule II, III or IV or violating the provisions of NRS 639.2391
to 639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted by the State
Board of Pharmacy pursuant thereto. Such disciplinary action must
include, without limitation, requiring the licensee to complete
additional continuing education concerning prescribing controlled
substances listed in schedules II, III and IV.
(b) Develop and disseminate to each physician and physician
assistant licensed pursuant to this chapter or make available on the
Internet website of the Board an explanation or a technical advisory
bulletin to inform those physicians and physician assistants of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 50 –
requirements of this section and NRS [630.324,] 639.23507 and
639.2391 to 639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted
pursuant thereto. The Board shall update the explanation or bulletin
as necessary to include any revisions to those provisions of law or
regulations. The explanation or bulletin must include, without
limitation, an explanation of the requirements that apply to specific
controlled substances or categories of controlled substances.
Sec. 54. NRS 630.326 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.326 1. If an investigation by the Board regarding a
physician, perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant or practitioner of respiratory care reasonably determines
that the health, safety or welfare of the public or any patient served
by the licensee is at risk of imminent or continued harm, the Board
may :
(a) Summarily restrict the practice of the licensee, including,
without limitation, restricting or suspending the ability of the
licensee to prescribe and dispense controlled substances, practice
in a specialty area, perform specific tasks or procedures or treat a
specific population of patients pending the conclusion of a
hearing to consider a formal charging document filed against the
licensee; or
(b) In accordance with subsection 3 of NRS 233B.127,
summarily suspend the license of the licensee pending the
conclusion of a hearing to consider a formal [complaint] charging
document against the licensee. The order of summary suspension
may be issued only by the Board or an investigative committee of
the Board.
2. [If the Board or an investigative committee of the Board
issues an order summarily suspending the license of a physician,
perfusionist, physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or
practitioner of respiratory care pursuant to subsection 1, the Board
shall hold a hearing not later than 60 days after the date on which
the order is issued, unless the Board and the licensee mutually agree
to a longer period, to determine whether a reasonable basis exists to
continue the suspension of the license pending the conclusion of a
hearing to consider a formal complaint against the licensee. If no
formal complaint against the licensee is pending before the Board
on the date on which a hearing is held pursuant to this section, the
Board shall reinstate the license of the licensee.
3.] If the Board or an investigative committee of the Board
issues an order summarily suspending the license of a licensee or
restricting the practice of a licensee pursuant to subsection 1 and
the Board requires the licensee to submit to a mental or physical
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 51 –
examination or an examination testing his or her competence to
practice, the examination must be conducted and the results
obtained not later than 30 days after the order is issued.
Sec. 55. NRS 630.329 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.329 If the Board issues an order summarily suspending the
license of a physician, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care or
summarily restricting the practice of a physician, perfusionist,
physician assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of
respiratory care pending proceedings for disciplinary action,
[including, without limitation, a summary suspension pursuant to
NRS 233B.127,] the court shall not stay that order.
Sec. 56. NRS 630.336 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.336 1. Any deliberations conducted or vote taken by the
Board or any investigative committee of the Board regarding its
ordering of a physician, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care to
undergo a physical or mental examination or any other examination
designated to assist the Board or committee in determining the
fitness of a physician, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care are not
subject to the requirements of NRS 241.020.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or 4, all
applications for a license to practice medicine, perfusion or
respiratory care, any charges filed by the Board, financial records of
the Board, formal hearings on any charges heard by the Board or a
panel selected by the Board, records of such hearings and any order
or decision of the Board or panel must be open to the public.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, the
following may be kept confidential:
(a) Any statement, evidence, credential or other proof submitted
in support of or to verify the contents of an application;
(b) Any report concerning the fitness of any person to receive or
hold a license to practice medicine, perfusion or respiratory care;
and
(c) Any communication between:
(1) The Board and any of its committees or panels; and
(2) The Board or its staff, investigators, experts, committees,
panels, hearing officers, advisory members or consultants and
counsel for the Board.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
239.0115, a complaint filed with the Board pursuant to NRS
630.307, all documents and other information filed with the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 52 –
complaint and all documents and other information compiled as a
result of an investigation conducted to determine whether to initiate
disciplinary action are confidential.
5. The formal [complaint or other] charging document filed by
the Board to initiate disciplinary action and all documents and
information considered by the Board when determining whether to
impose discipline are public records.
6. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or agency or any agency which is
investigating a person, including a law enforcement agency. Such
cooperation may include, without limitation, providing the board or
agency with minutes of a closed meeting, [transcripts of oral
examinations and] the results of [oral examinations.] any
examination conducted pursuant to NRS 630.318, a copy of any
such examination or any documents or transcripts relating to such
an examination.
7. To the extent practicable and authorized by a licensee, the
Board may communicate with, cooperate with or provide any
documents to the employer of a licensee or any other person or
entity responsible for credentialing a licensee to provide health
care on behalf of the person or entity.
Sec. 57. NRS 630.339 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.339 1. If a committee designated by the Board to
conduct an investigation of a complaint decides to proceed with
disciplinary action, it shall bring charges against the licensee by
filing a formal [complaint.] charging document. The formal
[complaint] charging document must include a written statement
setting forth the charges alleged and setting forth in concise and
plain language each act or omission of the respondent upon which
the charges are based. The formal [complaint] charging document
must be prepared with sufficient clarity to ensure that the respondent
is able to prepare a defense. The formal [complaint] charging
document must specify any applicable law or regulation that the
respondent is alleged to have violated. The formal [complaint]
charging document may be signed by the chair of the investigative
committee or the legal counsel for the Board.
2. The respondent may file an answer to the formal [complaint
within 20 days after service of the complaint upon the respondent.]
charging document pursuant to NRS 622A.320. An answer must
state in concise and plain language the respondent’s defenses to
each charge set forth in the [complaint] charging document and
must admit or deny the averments stated in the [complaint.]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 53 –
charging document. If a party fails to file an answer within the time
prescribed, the party shall be deemed to have denied generally the
allegations of the formal [complaint] charging document and the
Board or an investigative committee of the Board may proceed
pursuant to this section in the same manner as if the answer were
timely filed.
3. Within 20 days after the filing of an answer or 20 days after
the date on which an answer is due, whichever is earlier, the parties
shall hold an early case conference at which the parties and a
hearing officer appointed by the Board or a member of the Board
must preside. At the early case conference, the parties shall in good
faith:
(a) Set the earliest possible hearing date agreeable to the parties
and the hearing officer, panel of the Board or the Board, including
the estimated duration of the hearing;
(b) Set dates:
(1) By which all documents must be exchanged;
(2) By which all prehearing motions and responses thereto
must be filed;
(3) On which to hold the prehearing conference; and
(4) For any other foreseeable actions that may be required for
the matter;
(c) Discuss or attempt to resolve all or any portion of the
evidentiary or legal issues in the matter;
(d) Discuss the potential for settlement of the matter on terms
agreeable to the parties; and
(e) Discuss and deliberate any other issues that may facilitate the
timely and fair conduct of the matter.
4. [If the Board receives a report pursuant to subsection 5 of
NRS 228.420, such a hearing must be held within 30 days after
receiving the report. The Board shall notify the licensee of the
charges brought against him or her, the time and place set for the
hearing, and the possible sanctions authorized in NRS 630.352.
5.] A formal hearing must be held at the time and date set at
the early case conference by:
(a) The Board;
(b) A hearing officer;
(c) A member of the Board designated by the Board or an
investigative committee of the Board;
(d) A panel of members of the Board designated by an
investigative committee of the Board or the Board;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 54 –
(e) A hearing officer together with not more than one member of
the Board designated by an investigative committee of the Board or
the Board; or
(f) A hearing officer together with a panel of members of the
Board designated by an investigative committee of the Board or the
Board. If the hearing is before a panel, at least one member of
the panel must not be a physician.
[6. At any hearing at which at least one member of the Board
presides, whether in combination with a hearing officer or other
members of the Board, the final determinations regarding
credibility, weight of evidence and whether the charges have been
proven must be made by the members of the Board. If a hearing
officer presides together with one or more members of the Board,
the hearing officer shall:
(a) Conduct the hearing;
(b) In consultation with each member of the Board, make
rulings upon any objections raised at the hearing;
(c) In consultation with each member of the Board, make rulings
concerning any motions made during or after the hearing; and
(d) Within 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing, prepare
and file with the Board written findings of fact and conclusions of
law in accordance with the determinations made by each member of
the Board.]
Sec. 58. NRS 630.344 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.344 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 [,]
and chapter 622A of NRS, service of process under this chapter
[must] :
(a) Must be made on a licensee personally, or by [registered or]
certified mail [with return receipt requested] addressed to the
licensee at his or her last known mailing address [. If personal
service cannot be made and if notice by mail is returned
undelivered, the President or Secretary-Treasurer of the Board shall
cause notice to be published once a week for 4 consecutive weeks in
a newspaper published in the county of the last known address of
the licensee or, if no newspaper is published in that county, then in a
newspaper widely distributed in that county.] , as indicated in the
records of the Board.
(b) Shall be deemed complete:
(1) For personal service, on the date on which the process
is delivered to the person; or
(2) For service by certified mail, on the date on which the
process is mailed.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 55 –
2. In lieu of the methods of service of process set forth in
subsection 1, if the Board obtains written consent from the licensee,
service of process under this chapter may be made by electronic
mail on the licensee at an electronic mail address designated by the
licensee in the written consent. A licensee with a mailing address
outside of the United States must consent to service of process by
electronic mail.
3. Proof of service of process [or publication of notice made]
in connection with a contested case under this chapter must be filed
with the Board and may be recorded in the minutes of the Board [.] ,
if applicable.
4. As used in this section, “contested case” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 622A.020.
Sec. 59. NRS 630.352 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.352 1. Any member of the Board, other than a member
of an investigative committee of the Board who participated in any
determination regarding a complaint or the filing of a formal
[complaint] charging document in the matter or any member
serving on a panel of the Board at the hearing of the matter, may
participate in an adjudication to obtain the final order of the Board.
At the adjudication, the Board shall consider any findings of fact
and conclusions of law submitted after the hearing and shall allow:
(a) Counsel for the Board to present a disciplinary
recommendation and argument in support of the disciplinary
recommendation subject to the provisions of NRS 622A.200 and
622A.210; and
(b) The respondent or counsel of the respondent to present a
disciplinary recommendation and argument in support of the
disciplinary recommendation . [; and
(c) The complainant in the matter to make a statement to the
Board regarding the disciplinary recommendations by the parties
and to address the effect of the respondent’s conduct upon the
complainant or the patient involved, if other than the complainant.]
 The Board may limit the time within which the parties [and the
complainant] may make their arguments and statements.
2. At the conclusion of the presentations of the parties , [and
the complainant,] the Board shall deliberate and may by a majority
vote impose discipline based upon the findings of fact and
conclusions of law and the presentations of the parties . [and the
complainant.]
3. If, in the findings of fact and conclusions of law, the Board,
hearing officer or panel of the Board determines that no violation
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 56 –
has occurred, the Board shall dismiss the charges, in writing, and
notify the respondent that the charges have been dismissed.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, if the Board
finds that a violation has occurred, it shall by order take one or more
of the following actions:
(a) Place the person on probation for a specified period on any
of the conditions specified in the order;
(b) Administer a written public reprimand to the person;
(c) Limit the person’s practice or exclude one or more specified
branches of medicine from his or her practice;
(d) Suspend the person’s license for a specified period or until
further order of the Board;
(e) Revoke the person’s license;
(f) Require the person to participate in a program to correct an
alcohol or other substance use disorder or any other impairment;
(g) Require supervision of the person’s practice;
(h) Impose a fine not to exceed $10,000 for each violation;
(i) Require the person to perform community service without
compensation;
(j) Require the person to take a physical or mental examination
or an examination testing his or her competence; and
(k) Require the person to fulfill certain training or educational
requirements.
5. If the Board finds that the respondent has violated the
provisions of NRS 439B.425, the Board shall suspend the
respondent’s license for a specified period or until further order of
the Board.
6. The Board shall not administer a private reprimand if the
Board finds that a violation has occurred.
7. Within 30 days after the conclusion of the adjudication by
the Board, the Board shall issue a final order, certified by the
Secretary-Treasurer of the Board, that imposes discipline and
incorporates the findings of fact and conclusions of law obtained
from the hearing. An order that imposes discipline and the findings
of fact and conclusions of law supporting that order are public
records.
Sec. 60. NRS 630.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.355 1. If the respondent or a [person,] witness in a
proceeding before the Board, a hearing officer or a panel of the
Board:
(a) Disobeys or resists a lawful order;
(b) Refuses to take an oath or affirmation as a witness;
(c) Refuses to be examined; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 57 –
(d) Engages in conduct during a hearing or so near the place
thereof as to obstruct the proceeding,
 the Board, hearing officer or panel may certify the facts to the
district court of the county in which the proceeding is being
conducted. Such a certification operates as a stay of all related
disciplinary proceedings. The court shall issue an order directing the
[person] respondent or witness, as applicable, to appear before the
court and show cause why he or she should not be held in contempt.
2. A copy of the statement of the Board, hearing officer or
panel, and the order of the district court issued pursuant to
subsection 1, must be served on the [person.] respondent or witness,
as applicable. Thereafter, the court has jurisdiction of the matter.
3. The same proceedings must be had, the same penalties may
be imposed and the [person] respondent or witness, as applicable,
may purge himself or herself of the contempt in the same way as in
the case of a person who has committed a contempt in the trial of a
civil action.
Sec. 61. NRS 630.356 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.356 1. Any person aggrieved by a final order of the
Board is entitled to judicial review of the Board’s order.
2. Every order that imposes a sanction against a licensee
pursuant to subsection 4 or 5 of NRS 630.352 or any regulation of
the Board is effective from the date the Secretary-Treasurer certifies
the order until the date the order is modified or reversed by a final
judgment of the court. [The court shall not stay the order of the
Board pending a final determination by the court.]
3. The district court shall give a petition for judicial review of
the Board’s order priority over other civil matters which are not
expressly given priority by law.
Sec. 62. NRS 630.358 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.358 1. Any person:
(a) Whose practice of medicine, perfusion or respiratory care
has been limited; or
(b) Whose license to practice medicine, perfusion or respiratory
care has been [:
(1) Suspended] suspended until further order [; or
(2) Revoked,
 by an order] of the Board,
 may [apply to] petition the Board for removal of the limitation or
[restoration of the license.] suspension.
2. In hearing [the application,] a petition received pursuant to
subsection 1, the Board:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 58 –
(a) May require the person to submit to a mental or physical
examination or an examination testing his or her competence to
practice [medicine, perfusion or respiratory care by physicians,
perfusionists or practitioners] as a physician, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant, perfusionist or practitioner of
respiratory care, as appropriate, or other examinations it designates
and submit such other evidence of changed conditions and of fitness
as it deems proper;
(b) Shall determine whether under all the circumstances the time
of the [application] petition is reasonable; and
(c) May deny the [application] petition or modify or rescind its
order as it deems the evidence and the public safety warrants.
3. The licensee has the burden of proving by clear and
convincing evidence that the requirements for [restoration of the
license or] removal of the limitation or suspension have been met.
4. The Board shall not [restore a license] remove a limitation
or suspension unless it is satisfied that the person has complied with
all of the terms and conditions set forth in the final order of the
Board and that the person is capable of practicing [medicine,
perfusion or respiratory care] as a physician, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant, perfusionist or practitioner of
respiratory care, as appropriate, in a safe manner.
5. To restore a license that has been revoked by the Board, [the
applicant] a person must apply for a license and [take an
examination] meet all of the requirements for the issuance of the
license at the time of the application as though the applicant had
never been licensed under this chapter.
Sec. 63. NRS 630.364 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.364 1. Any person or organization who furnishes
information concerning an applicant for a license or a licensee in
good faith in accordance with the provisions of this chapter is
immune from any civil action for furnishing that information.
2. The Board and any of its members and its staff, counsel,
investigators, experts, peer reviewers, committees, panels, hearing
officers, consultants and the employees or volunteers of a diversion
program are immune from any civil liability for:
(a) Any decision or action taken in good faith in response to
information acquired by the Board.
(b) Disseminating information concerning an applicant for a
license or a licensee to other boards or agencies of the State, the
Attorney General, any hospitals, medical societies, insurers,
employers, patients and their families or any law enforcement
agency.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 59 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the Board
shall not commence an investigation, impose any disciplinary action
or take any other adverse action against a [physician] licensee for:
(a) Disclosing to a governmental entity in good faith a violation
of any law, rule or regulation by an applicant for a license [to
practice medicine] or by a [physician;] licensee; or
(b) Cooperating in good faith with a governmental entity that is
conducting an investigation, hearing or inquiry into such a violation,
including, without limitation, providing testimony concerning the
violation.
4. A [physician] licensee who discloses information to or
cooperates with a governmental entity pursuant to subsection 3 with
respect to the violation of any law, rule or regulation by the
[physician] licensee is subject to investigation and any other
administrative or disciplinary action by the Board under the
provisions of this chapter for such violation.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Diversion program” means a program approved by the
Board to correct a licensee’s alcohol or other substance use disorder
or any other impairment.
(b) “Governmental entity” includes, without limitation:
(1) A federal, state or local officer, employee, agency,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, council, authority
or other subdivision or entity of a public employer;
(2) A federal, state or local employee, committee, member or
commission of the Legislative Branch of Government;
(3) A federal, state or local representative, member or
employee of a legislative body or a county, town, village or any
other political subdivision or civil division of the State;
(4) A federal, state or local law enforcement agency or
prosecutorial office, or any member or employee thereof, or police
or peace officer; and
(5) A federal, state or local judiciary, or any member or
employee thereof, or grand or petit jury.
Sec. 64. NRS 630.371 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.371 Laser surgery or intense pulsed light therapy on the
globe of the eye of a patient may be performed only by a licensed
physician who has completed a program of progressive postgraduate
education in ophthalmology as a resident in the United States or
[Canada] an equivalent foreign country in a program approved by
the Board, the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical
Education , or [the Council on Medical Education of the Canadian
Medical Association.] its successor organization, or an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 60 –
organization that accredits graduate medical education in an
equivalent foreign country and is nationally recognized in that
country.
Sec. 65. NRS 630.373 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.373 1. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
2, a physician , physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant
shall not administer or supervise directly the administration of
general anesthesia, tumescent anesthesia, conscious sedation or
deep sedation to patients unless the general anesthesia, tumescent
anesthesia, conscious sedation or deep sedation is administered:
(a) In an office of a physician or osteopathic physician which
holds a permit pursuant to NRS 449.435 to 449.448, inclusive;
(b) In a facility which holds a permit pursuant to NRS 449.435
to 449.448, inclusive;
(c) In a medical facility as that term is defined in NRS
449.0151; or
(d) Outside of this State.
2. The Board may adopt regulations that authorize a
physician, physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant to
administer or supervise directly the administration of tumescent
anesthesia in a location that does not meet the requirements of
subsection 1.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Conscious sedation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.436.
(b) “Deep sedation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.437.
(c) “General anesthesia” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.438.
(d) “Tumescent anesthesia” means local anesthesia caused by
the subcutaneous injection of a dilute mixture that includes,
without limitation, local anesthetic and epinephrine.
Sec. 66. Chapter 632 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 67 and 68 of this act.
Sec. 67. 1. “Medical assistant” means a person who:
(a) Performs clinical tasks under the supervision of a
registered nurse, including, without limitation, an advanced
practice registered nurse; and
(b) Does not hold a license, certificate or registration issued by
a professional licensing or regulatory board in this State to
perform such clinical tasks.
2. The term does not include a person who performs only
administrative, clerical, executive or other nonclinical tasks.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 61 –
Sec. 68. Each time an advanced practice registered nurse
performs a routine physical examination of a person who is at
least 12 years of age but not more than 18 years of age, the
advanced practice registered nurse shall ask the person the
questions prescribed in the Medical History Form and the
Physical Examination Form of the Preparticipation Physical
Evaluation Form developed jointly by the American Academy of
Family Physicians, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the
American College of Sports Medicine, the American Medical
Society for Sports Medicine, the American Orthopaedic Society for
Sports Medicine and the American Osteopathic Academy of Sports
Medicine, or any successor form.
Sec. 69. NRS 632.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 632.011 to 632.0195,
inclusive, and section 67 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 70. NRS 632.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.120 1. The Board shall:
(a) Adopt regulations establishing reasonable standards:
(1) For the denial, renewal, suspension and revocation of,
and the placement of conditions, limitations and restrictions upon, a
license to practice professional or practical nursing or a certificate to
practice as a nursing assistant or medication aide - certified.
(2) Of professional conduct for the practice of nursing.
(3) For prescribing and dispensing controlled substances and
dangerous drugs in accordance with applicable statutes.
(4) For the psychiatric training and experience necessary for
an advanced practice registered nurse to be authorized to make the
diagnoses, evaluations and examinations described in NRS
432B.6078, 432B.60816, 433A.162, 433A.240, 433A.335,
433A.390, 433A.430, 484C.300 and 484C.320 to 484C.350,
inclusive, the certifications described in NRS 432B.6075,
432B.60814, 433A.170, 433A.195 and 433A.200 and the sworn
statements or declarations described in NRS 433A.210 and
433A.335.
(b) Prepare and administer examinations for the issuance of a
license or certificate under this chapter.
(c) Investigate and determine the eligibility of an applicant for a
license or certificate under this chapter.
(d) Carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 62 –
(e) Develop and disseminate annually to each registered nurse
who cares for children information concerning the signs and
symptoms of pediatric cancer.
2. The Board may adopt regulations establishing reasonable:
(a) Qualifications for the issuance of a license or certificate
under this chapter.
(b) Standards for the continuing professional competence of
licensees or holders of a certificate. The Board may evaluate
licensees or holders of a certificate periodically for compliance with
those standards.
(c) Requirements governing the supervision of a medical
assistant, including, without limitation, regulations which
prescribe limitations on the possession and administration of a
dangerous drug by a medical assistant.
3. The Board may adopt regulations establishing a schedule of
reasonable fees and charges, in addition to those set forth in NRS
632.345, for:
(a) Investigating licensees or holders of a certificate and
applicants for a license or certificate under this chapter;
(b) Evaluating the professional competence of licensees or
holders of a certificate;
(c) Conducting hearings pursuant to this chapter;
(d) Duplicating and verifying records of the Board; and
(e) Surveying, evaluating and approving schools of practical
nursing, and schools and courses of professional nursing,
 and collect the fees established pursuant to this subsection.
4. For the purposes of this chapter, the Board shall, by
regulation, define the term “in the process of obtaining
accreditation.”
5. The Board may adopt such other regulations, not
inconsistent with state or federal law, as may be necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter relating to nursing assistant
trainees, nursing assistants and medication aides - certified.
6. The Board may adopt such other regulations, not
inconsistent with state or federal law, as are necessary to enable it to
administer the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 70.5. NRS 632.2397 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
632.2397 1. A certified registered nurse anesthetist may:
(a) Under the supervision of a physician licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, order, prescribe, possess and administer
controlled substances, poisons, dangerous drugs and devices to treat
a patient under the care of a licensed physician in a critical access
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 63 –
hospital or a hospital located in a city whose population is less
than 25,000 in preparation for surgery or childbirth, during surgery
or childbirth and while a patient recovers from surgery or childbirth.
(b) Possess and administer controlled substances, poisons,
dangerous drugs and devices in other circumstances under which a
registered nurse is authorized to possess and administer controlled
substances, poisons, dangerous drugs and devices.
2. A certified registered nurse anesthetist shall not order or
prescribe a controlled substance, poison, dangerous drug or device
except as authorized by paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
3. As used in this section, “critical access hospital” means a
hospital which has been certified as a critical access hospital by the
Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to 42 U.S.C.
1395i-4(e).
Sec. 71. NRS 632.347 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.347 1. The Board may deny, revoke or suspend any
license or certificate applied for or issued pursuant to this chapter, or
take other disciplinary action against a licensee or holder of a
certificate, upon determining that the licensee or certificate holder:
(a) Is guilty of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to
procure a license or certificate pursuant to this chapter.
(b) Is guilty of any offense:
(1) Involving moral turpitude; or
(2) Related to the qualifications, functions or duties of a
licensee or holder of a certificate,
 in which case the record of conviction is conclusive evidence
thereof.
(c) Has been convicted of violating any of the provisions of
NRS 616D.200, 616D.220, 616D.240 or 616D.300 to 616D.440,
inclusive.
(d) Is unfit or incompetent by reason of gross negligence or
recklessness in carrying out usual nursing functions.
(e) Uses any controlled substance, dangerous drug as defined in
chapter 454 of NRS, or intoxicating liquor to an extent or in a
manner which is dangerous or injurious to any other person or
which impairs his or her ability to conduct the practice authorized
by the license or certificate.
(f) Is a person with mental incompetence.
(g) Is guilty of unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is
not limited to, the following:
(1) Conviction of practicing medicine without a license in
violation of chapter 630 of NRS, in which case the record of
conviction is conclusive evidence thereof.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 64 –
(2) Impersonating any applicant or acting as proxy for an
applicant in any examination required pursuant to this chapter for
the issuance of a license or certificate.
(3) Impersonating another licensed practitioner or holder of a
certificate.
(4) Permitting or allowing another person to use his or her
license or certificate to practice as a licensed practical nurse,
registered nurse, nursing assistant or medication aide - certified.
(5) Repeated malpractice, which may be evidenced by claims
of malpractice settled against the licensee or certificate holder.
(6) Physical, verbal or psychological abuse of a patient.
(7) Conviction for the use or unlawful possession of a
controlled substance or dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of
NRS.
(h) Has willfully or repeatedly violated the provisions of this
chapter. The voluntary surrender of a license or certificate issued
pursuant to this chapter is prima facie evidence that the licensee or
certificate holder has committed or expects to commit a violation of
this chapter.
(i) Is guilty of aiding or abetting any person in a violation of this
chapter.
(j) Has falsified an entry on a patient’s medical chart concerning
a controlled substance.
(k) Has falsified information which was given to a physician,
pharmacist, podiatric physician or dentist to obtain a controlled
substance.
(l) Has knowingly procured or administered a controlled
substance or a dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS that
is not approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration,
unless the unapproved controlled substance or dangerous drug:
(1) Was procured through a retail pharmacy licensed
pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS;
(2) Was procured through a Canadian pharmacy which is
licensed pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS and which has been
recommended by the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 639.2328;
(3) Is cannabis being used for medical purposes in
accordance with chapter 678C of NRS; or
(4) Is an individualized investigational treatment or
investigational drug or biological product prescribed to a patient
pursuant to NRS 630.3735 or 633.6945.
(m) Has been disciplined in another state in connection with a
license to practice nursing or a certificate to practice as a nursing
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 65 –
assistant or medication aide - certified, or has committed an act in
another state which would constitute a violation of this chapter.
(n) Has engaged in conduct likely to deceive, defraud or
endanger a patient or the general public.
(o) Has willfully failed to comply with a regulation, subpoena or
order of the Board.
(p) Has operated a medical facility at any time during which:
(1) The license of the facility was suspended or revoked; or
(2) An act or omission occurred which resulted in the
suspension or revocation of the license pursuant to NRS 449.160.
 This paragraph applies to an owner or other principal responsible
for the operation of the facility.
(q) Is an advanced practice registered nurse who has failed to
obtain any training required by the Board pursuant to
NRS 632.2375.
(r) Is an advanced practice registered nurse who has failed to
comply with the provisions of NRS 453.163, 453.164, 453.226,
639.23507, 639.23535 and 639.2391 to 639.23916, inclusive, and
any regulations adopted by the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant
thereto.
(s) Has engaged in the fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescribing, administering or dispensing of
a controlled substance listed in schedule II, III or IV.
(t) Has violated the provisions of NRS 454.217 or 629.086.
(u) Has performed or supervised the performance of a pelvic
examination in violation of NRS 629.085.
(v) Has failed to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315
or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
(w) Has failed to supervise adequately a medical assistant
pursuant to the regulations of the Board.
2. For the purposes of this section, a plea or verdict of guilty or
guilty but mentally ill or a plea of nolo contendere constitutes a
conviction of an offense. The Board may take disciplinary action
pending the appeal of a conviction.
3. A licensee or certificate holder is not subject to disciplinary
action solely for administering auto-injectable epinephrine pursuant
to a valid order issued pursuant to NRS 630.374 or 633.707.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Individualized investigational treatment” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 454.690.
(b) “Investigational drug or biological product” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 454.351.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 66 –
Sec. 72. Chapter 633 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Each time an osteopathic physician or physician assistant
performs a routine physical examination of a person who is at
least 12 years of age but not more than 18 years of age, the
physician or physician assistant shall ask the person the questions
prescribed in the Medical History Form and the Physical
Examination Form of the Preparticipation Physical Evaluation
Form developed jointly by the American Academy of Family
Physicians, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American
College of Sports Medicine, the American Medical Society for
Sports Medicine, the American Orthopaedic Society for Sports
Medicine and the American Osteopathic Academy of Sports
Medicine, or any successor form.
Sec. 73. NRS 633.2815 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.2815 1. On or before the last day of each quarter, the
Board shall provide the Board of Medical Examiners a list of all
anesthesiologist assistants licensed by the Board.
2. The Board and the Board of Medical Examiners shall
share information as necessary to enforce the provisions of NRS
630.26835, 630.2684, 630.26845 and 633.4256.
Sec. 74. NRS 633.2815 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.2815 1. On or before the last day of each quarter, the
Board shall provide the Board of Medical Examiners a list of all
anesthesiologist assistants licensed by the Board.
2. The Board and the Board of Medical Examiners shall
share information as necessary to enforce the provisions of NRS
630.26835, 630.2684, 630.26845, 633.4256, 633.4258 and 633.426.
Sec. 75. NRS 633.282 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.282 1. On or before the last day of each quarter, the
Board shall provide to the Board of Medical Examiners a list of all
physician assistants licensed by the Board.
2. The Board and the Board of Medical Examiners shall
share information as necessary to enforce the provisions of NRS
630.2677, 630.2735, 630.2755, 633.4332, 633.438, 633.4718.
Sec. 76. NRS 633.4256 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.4256 1. A person applying for a license to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
who wishes to hold a simultaneous license to practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 630
of NRS must:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 67 –
[1.] (a) Indicate in the application that he or she wishes to hold
a simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS;
[2.] (b) Apply for a license to practice as an anesthesiologist
assistant to:
[(a)] (1) The Board pursuant to this chapter; and
[(b)] (2) The Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to chapter
630 of NRS; and
[3.] (c) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501;
and
[(b)] (2) The fee for application for and issuance of a
simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist assistant established
pursuant to NRS 630.268.
2. If a person who applies for an anesthesiologist assistant
license pursuant to the provisions of this chapter indicates that he
or she wishes to hold a simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist
assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS and
pays the application and initial simultaneous license fee for an
anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501
and the person does not pay the fee for application for and
issuance of a simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist assistant
established pursuant to NRS 630.268 within 1 year after the
issuance of his or her license pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine shall notify the
person that he or she is required to pay to the Board the difference
between:
(1) The application and initial license fee for an
anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501;
and
(2) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501;
and
(b) The person shall pay to the State Board of Osteopathic
Medicine the amount required by paragraph (a) not later than
30 days after the date of the notice provided pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 77. NRS 633.4258 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.4258 1. A person applying to renew an anesthesiologist
assistant license pursuant to the provisions of this chapter who
wishes to hold a simultaneous anesthesiologist assistant license
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS must:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 68 –
[1.] (a) Indicate in the application that he or she wishes to hold
a simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS;
[2.] (b) Apply:
[(a)] (1) To renew an anesthesiologist assistant license to the
Board pursuant to this chapter; and
[(b)] (2) For an anesthesiologist assistant license to the Board of
Medical Examiners pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS; and
[3.] (c) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The fee for [initial] biennial simultaneous renewal of
an anesthesiologist assistant license [as an anesthesiologist
assistant] established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
[(b)] (2) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268.
2. If an applicant to renew an anesthesiologist assistant
license pursuant to the provisions of this chapter indicates that he
or she wishes to hold a simultaneous license as an anesthesiologist
assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS and
pays the fee for biennial simultaneous renewal of an
anesthesiologist assistant license established pursuant to NRS
633.501 but does not pay the application and initial simultaneous
license fee for an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to
NRS 630.268 within 1 year after the renewal of his or her license
pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine shall notify the
anesthesiologist assistant that he or she is required to pay to the
Board the difference between:
(1) The fee for biennial renewal of an anesthesiologist
assistant license established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
(2) The fee for biennial simultaneous renewal of an
anesthesiologist assistant license established pursuant to NRS
633.501; and
(b) The anesthesiologist assistant shall pay to the State Board
of Osteopathic Medicine the amount required by paragraph (a)
not later than 30 days after the date of the notice provided
pursuant to paragraph (a).
Sec. 78. NRS 633.426 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.426 1. If a person licensed as an anesthesiologist
assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is not applying to
renew his or her license and wishes to hold a simultaneous license
as an anesthesiologist assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter
630 of NRS, the person must:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 69 –
[1.] (a) Apply for an anesthesiologist assistant license to the
Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS; and
[2.] (b) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The fee for biennial simultaneous [registration]
renewal of an anesthesiologist assistant license established pursuant
to NRS 633.501; and
[(b)] (2) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
an anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268.
2. If a person licensed as an anesthesiologist assistant
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter pays the fee for biennial
simultaneous renewal of an anesthesiologist assistant license
established pursuant to NRS 633.501 in accordance with
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 but does not
pay the application and initial simultaneous license fee for an
anesthesiologist assistant established pursuant to NRS 630.268
within 1 year after the next time the person renews his or her
license pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine shall notify the
anesthesiologist assistant that he or she is required to pay to the
Board the difference between:
(1) The fee for biennial renewal of an anesthesiologist
assistant license established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
(2) The fee for biennial simultaneous renewal of an
anesthesiologist assistant license established pursuant to NRS
633.501; and
(b) The anesthesiologist assistant shall pay to the State Board
of Osteopathic Medicine the amount required by paragraph (a)
not later than 30 days after the date of the notice provided
pursuant to paragraph (a).
Sec. 79. NRS 633.4332 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.4332 1. A person applying for a license to practice as a
physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter who
wishes to hold a simultaneous license to practice as a physician
assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS must:
[1.] (a) Indicate in the application that he or she wishes to hold
a simultaneous license to practice as a physician assistant pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS;
[2.] (b) Apply for a license to practice as a physician assistant
to:
[(a)] (1) The Board pursuant to this chapter; and
[(b)] (2) The Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to chapter
630 of NRS; and
[3.] (c) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 70 –
[(a)] (1) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
a physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
[(b)] (2) The fee for application for and issuance of a
simultaneous license as a physician assistant established pursuant to
NRS 630.268.
2. If a person who applies for a license to practice as a
physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
indicates that he or she wishes to hold a simultaneous license to
practice as a physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 630 of NRS and pays the application and initial
simultaneous license fee for a physician assistant established
pursuant to NRS 633.501 but does not pay the fee for application
for and issuance of a simultaneous license as a physician assistant
established pursuant to NRS 630.268 within 1 year after the
issuance of his or her license pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine shall notify the
person that he or she is required to pay to the Board the difference
between:
(1) The application and initial license fee for a physician
assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
(2) The application and initial simultaneous license fee for
a physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
(b) The person shall pay to the State Board of Osteopathic
Medicine the amount required by paragraph (a) not later than
30 days after the date of the notice provided pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 80. NRS 633.438 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.438 1. If a person licensed to practice as a physician
assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is not applying to
renew his or her license and wishes to hold a simultaneous license to
practice as a physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 630 of NRS, the person must:
[1.] (a) Apply for a license to practice as a physician assistant to
the Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS;
and
[2.] (b) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The annual simultaneous registration fee for a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
[(b)] (2) The fee for application for and issuance of a
simultaneous license as a physician assistant established pursuant to
NRS 630.268.
2. If a person licensed as a physician assistant pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter pays the annual simultaneous
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 71 –
registration fee for a physician assistant established pursuant to
NRS 633.501 in accordance with subparagraph (1) of paragraph
(b) of subsection 1 but does not pay the fee for application for and
issuance of a simultaneous license as a physician assistant
established pursuant to NRS 630.268 within 1 year after the next
time the person renews his or her license pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine shall notify the
person that he or she is required to pay to the Board the difference
between:
(1) The annual registration fee for a physician assistant
established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
(2) The annual simultaneous registration fee for a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
(b) The person shall pay to the State Board of Osteopathic
Medicine the amount required by paragraph (a) not later than
30 days after the date of the notice provided pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 81. NRS 633.4718 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.4718 1. A person applying to renew a license to practice
as a physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
who wishes to hold a simultaneous license to practice as a physician
assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS must:
[1.] (a) Indicate in the application that he or she wishes to hold
a simultaneous license to practice as a physician assistant pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS;
[2.] (b) Apply:
[(a)] (1) To renew a license to practice as a physician assistant
to the Board pursuant to this chapter; and
[(b)] (2) For a license to practice as a physician assistant to the
Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS; and
[3.] (c) Pay all applicable fees, including, without limitation:
[(a)] (1) The annual simultaneous registration fee for a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
[(b)] (2) The fee for application for and issuance of a
simultaneous license as a physician assistant established pursuant to
NRS 630.268.
2. If an applicant to renew a license to practice as a physician
assistant pursuant to the provisions of this chapter indicates that
he or she wishes to hold a simultaneous license to practice as a
physician assistant pursuant to the provisions of chapter 630 of
NRS and pays the annual simultaneous registration fee for a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501 but does
not pay the fee for application for and issuance of a simultaneous
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 72 –
license as a physician assistant established pursuant to NRS
630.268 within 1 year after the renewal of his or her license
pursuant to this chapter:
(a) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine shall notify the
physician assistant that he or she is required to pay to the Board
the difference between:
(1) The annual registration fee for a physician assistant
established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
(2) The annual simultaneous registration fee for a
physician assistant established pursuant to NRS 633.501; and
(b) The physician assistant shall pay to the State Board of
Osteopathic Medicine the amount required by paragraph (a) not
later than 30 days after the date of the notice provided pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 82. NRS 652.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
652.210 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection]
subsections 2 and 3 and NRS 126.121 and 652.186, no person other
than a licensed physician, a licensed optometrist, a licensed practical
nurse, a registered nurse, a perfusionist, a physician assistant
licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, a certified
advanced emergency medical technician, a certified paramedic, a
practitioner of respiratory care licensed pursuant to chapter 630 of
NRS, a licensed anesthesiologist assistant, a licensed dentist or a
registered pharmacist may manipulate a person for the collection of
specimens. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
persons described in this subsection may perform any laboratory test
which is classified as a waived test pursuant to Subpart A of Part
493 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations without
obtaining certification as an assistant in a medical laboratory
pursuant to NRS 652.127.
2. In addition to the laboratory tests authorized by subsection
1, a practitioner of respiratory care licensed pursuant to chapter
630 of NRS may perform any laboratory test which is classified as
a waived test pursuant to Subpart A of Part 493 of Title 42 of the
Code of Federal Regulations without obtaining certification as an
assistant in a medical laboratory pursuant to NRS 652.127 if:
(a) The practitioner of respiratory care has been properly
trained to perform the test; and
(b) Performing the test is within the scope of practice of a
practitioner of respiratory care.
3. The technical personnel of a laboratory may collect blood,
remove stomach contents, perform certain diagnostic skin tests or
field blood tests or collect material for smears and cultures.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 73 –
Sec. 83. 1. A special license or a restricted license issued
pursuant to NRS 630.261 expires on January 1, 2026.
2. A special purpose license issued pursuant to NRS 630.261
before January 1, 2026, shall be deemed equivalent to a
telemedicine license issued pursuant to NRS 630.261, as amended
by section 25 of this act, on or after January 1, 2026.
3. The amendatory provisions of sections 29, 31, 32, 33, 38 and
42 of this act apply to any person who has indicated to the Board of
Medical Examiners that he or she intends to apply to the State Board
of Osteopathic Medicine for a simultaneous license as a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant, as applicable, before, on or
after January 1, 2026.
4. The amendatory provisions of sections 76, 79, 80 and 81 of
this act apply to any person who has indicated to the State Board of
Osteopathic Medicine that he or she intends to apply to the Board
of Medical Examiners for a simultaneous license as a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant, as applicable, before, on or
after January 1, 2026.
5. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of section 65 of
this act, a physician, physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant
who is administering or supervising directly the administration of
tumescent anesthesia in a location not authorized by NRS 630.373,
as amended by section 65 of this act, on January 1, 2026, may
continue to administer or supervise directly the administration of
tumescent anesthesia in such a location until July 1, 2026.
Sec. 84. NRS 630.1606, 630.2692, 630.2693 and 630.324 are
hereby repealed.
Sec. 85. 1. This section and section 70.5 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 70, inclusive, 71, 72, 75, 76 and 79 to 84,
inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
3. Section 73 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes,
 if and only if no bill is enacted by the Legislature and approved
by the Governor this session to authorize the State Board of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 74 –
Osteopathic Medicine to charge fees for the renewal and
simultaneous renewal of a license as an anesthesiologist assistant.
4. Sections 74, 77 and 78 of this bill become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes,
 if and only if a bill is enacted by the Legislature and approved by
the Governor this session to authorize the State Board of
Osteopathic Medicine to charge fees for the renewal and
simultaneous renewal of a license as an anesthesiologist assistant.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)